
The Little Book
That Beats the Market
Joel Greenblatt
John Wiley & Sons, Inc.


The Little Book
That Beats the Market


The Little Book
That Beats the Market
Joel Greenblatt
John Wiley & Sons, Inc.

Copyright © 2006 by Joel Greenblatt. All rights reserved
Published by John Wiley & Sons, Inc., Hoboken, New Jersey
Published simultaneously in Canada
No part of this publication may be reproduced, stored in a retrieval system, or transmitted in any form or by any means, electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording, scanning, or otherwise, except as permitted under Section 107 or 108 of the
1976 United States Copyright Act, without either the prior written permission of
the Publisher, or authorization through payment of the appropriate per-copy fee to
the Copyright Clearance Center, Inc., 222 Rosewood Drive, Danvers, MA 01923,
(978) 750-8400, fax (978) 750-4470, or on the web at www.copyright.com. Requests
to the Publisher for permission should be addressed to the Permissions Department,
John Wiley & Sons, Inc., 111 River Street, Hoboken, NJ 07030, (201) 748-6011,
fax (201) 748-6008, or online at http://www.wiley.com/go/permissions.
Limit of Liability/Disclaimer of Warranty: While the publisher and author have used
their best efforts in preparing this book, they make no representations or warranties
with respect to the accuracy or completeness of the contents of this book and specifically disclaim any implied warranties of merchantability or fitness for a particular
purpose. No warranty may be created or extended by sales representatives or written sales materials. The advice and strategies contained herein may not be suitable
for your situation. You should consult with a professional where appropriate. Neither the publisher nor author shall be liable for any loss of profit or any other commercial damages, including but not limited to special, incidental, consequential, or
other damages.
For general information on our other products and services or for technical support,
please contact our Customer Care Department within the United States at (800)
762-2974, outside the United States at (317) 572-3993 or fax (317) 572-4002.
Wiley also publishes its books in a variety of electronic formats. Some content that
appears in print may not be available in electronic books. For more information
about Wiley products, visit our web site at www.wiley.com.
ISBN-13 978-0-471-73306-5
ISBN-10 0-471-73306-7
Printed in the United States of America
10 9 8 7 6 5 4 3 2 1

To my wonderful wife, Julie,
and our five magnificent spin-offs


Contents
Acknowledgments ix
Foreword by Andrew Tobias xiii
Introduction xvii
Chapter One 1
Chapter Two 8
Chapter Three 16
Chapter Four 26
Chapter Five 37
Chapter Six 48
Chapter Seven 58
Chapter Eight 67
Chapter Nine 77
Chapter Ten 88

Chapter Eleven 100
Chapter Twelve 110
Chapter Thirteen 121
Step-by-Step Instructions 131
Appendix 137
[viii] CONTENTS

Acknowledgments
I am grateful to the many friends, colleagues, and family
who have contributed to this project. In particular, special
thanks are due to my partners at Gotham Capital, Rob
Goldstein and John Petry. Not only are they the true
coauthors of the Magic Formula study that appears in this
book, but it is also a rare privilege to be associated with
such brilliant, talented, and generous people. Their contributions to this book—and to the success of Gotham
Capital—cannot be overstated and are appreciated more
than they know. I would also like to give special thanks to
Edward Ramsden at Caburn Capital for his extraordinarily
insightful comments, suggestions, and editing work; to
Norbert Lou at Punchcard Capital, particularly for his
inspiration and suggestions for Chapter 9; and to Patrick
Ede at Gotham Capital for his major contributions to the
Magic Formula study, for his intelligent and helpful

comments, and for his editing talents. In addition, my
brother, Richard Greenblatt at America Capital, deserves
a major part of the credit for being my editor-at-large, for
his many good ideas, for his numerous contributions to
each chapter, and especially for his encouragement with
this project and throughout my life.
I am also grateful for the many helpful contributions
and inspiration provided by Dr. Sharon Curhan (my sister,
and my favorite artist), Dr. Gary Curhan, Joshua Curhan,
Justin Curhan, Linda Greenblatt Gordon at Saddle Rock
Partners, Michael Gordon, Bryan Binder at Caxton Associates, Dr. Susan Binder, Allan and Mickey Greenblatt
(my wonderful parents), Dr. George and Cecile Teebor
(the famous in-laws), Ezra Merkin at Gabriel Capital, Rod
Moskowitz, John Scully, Marc Silbert, David Rabinowitz
at Kirkwood Capital, Larry Balaban, Rabbi Label Lam,
Eric Rosenfeld at Crescendo Partners, Robert Kushel (my
broker at Smith Barney), Dan Nir at Gracie Capital,
Brian Gaines at Springhouse Capital, Bruce Newberg
(who got me started), Matthew Newberg, and Rich Pzena
at Pzena Investment Management. Special thanks to
David Pugh, my editor at John Wiley, and Sandra Dijkstra, my literary agent, for their encouragement and
enthusiastic support of this project. Thank you also to
Andrew Tobias for graciously writing the foreword and
for being a good friend.
[x] ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

I would also like to thank my two oldest children,
Matthew and Rebecca Greenblatt, for being willing students and readers (and for laughing at most of the jokes).
To my three youngest children, thank you for your inspiration. And to all the kids, thank you for the joy you bring
each day. Thank you also to my beautiful wife, Julie, for
her sage advice with this book, and in life, for her love and
support and for each precious day together.
ACKNOWLEDGMENTS [xi]


Foreword
The best thing about this book—from which I intend to
steal liberally for the next edition of The Only Investment
Guide You’ll Ever Need—is that most people won’t believe
it. Or, believing it, won’t have the patience to follow its
advice. That’s good, because the more people who know
about a good thing, the more expensive that thing ordinarily becomes . . . bye-bye bargain.
Yet unlike most “systems” meant to exploit anomalies
in the market, Joel Greenblatt’s simple notion will likely
retain at least a good deal of its validity even if it becomes
widely followed.
I don’t want to spoil the surprise—the book is short
enough as it is. My role here is simply to introduce you to
the author, so you have some sense of just how far you can
trust him.

I’ve known Joel for decades. He is really smart, really
modest, really well intentioned and—here is the unusual
part—really successful. (I mean: really successful.)
More to the point, his success has come from shrewd
investing (not from selling books).
He is also funny. I read the first couple of chapters of
this book to my 11-year-old nephew, Timmy, and we both
enjoyed it. Timmy, with no investable funds that I know
of, then fell asleep as I raced to the end, mentally rejiggering my retirement plan.
Let me tell you this much: In the beginning, there
were mutual funds, and that was good. But their sales fees
and expenses were way too high. Then came no-load
funds, which were better. They eliminated the sales fee,
but were still burdened with management fees and with
the tax and transactional burden that comes from active
management. Then came “index funds,” which cut fees,
taxes, and transaction costs to the bone. Very, very good.
What Joel would have you consider, in effect, is an
index-fund-plus, where the “plus” comes from including
in your basket of stocks only good businesses selling at low
valuations. And he has an easy way for you to find them.
Not everyone can beat the averages, of course—by
definition. But my guess is that patient people who follow
Joel’s advice will beat them over time. And that if millions
of people should adopt this strategy (Vanguard: please
[xiv] FOREWORD

hurry up and offer a low-priced fund like this), two things
will happen. First, the advantage of investing this way will
diminish but not disappear. Second, stock market valuations will become ever so slightly more rational, making
our capital allocation process ever so slightly more efficient.
Not bad work for a skinny little book.
Now, gather ye what 11-year-olds ye may, and dive in.
—Andrew Tobias, author of
The Only Investment Guide You’ll Ever Need
FOREWORD [xv]


Introduction
This book was originally inspired by my desire to give each
of my five children a gift. I figured if I could teach them
how to make money for themselves, then I would be giving
them a great gift—truly one that would keep giving. I also
figured that if I could explain how to make money in terms
that even my kids could understand (the ones already in
sixth and eighth grades, anyway), then I could pretty much
teach anyone how to be a successful stock market investor.
While the concepts covered in this book may seem
simple—perhaps too simple for sophisticated investors—
each step along the way is there for a reason. Stay with it,
and I assure you the payoff for both beginning and experienced investors will be huge.
After more than 25 years of investing professionally
and after 9 years of teaching at an Ivy League business
school, I am convinced of at least two things:

1. If you really want to “beat the market,” most professionals and academics can’t help you, and
2. That leaves only one real alternative: You must do
it yourself.
Luckily, that might not be such a bad thing. As
improbable as it may seem, you can learn to beat the
market. Through a simple, step-by-step process, this
book can teach you how. To help you along, I have
included a magic formula. The formula is simple, it
makes perfect sense, and with it, you can beat the market, the professionals, and the academics by a wide margin. And you can do it with low risk. The formula has
worked for many years and will continue to work even
after everyone knows it. Although the formula is easy to
use and will not take much of your time, it will work for
you only if you make the effort to fully understand why it
works.
Along the way, you will learn:
• How to view the stock market
• Why success eludes almost all individual and professional investors
• How to find good companies at bargain prices
• How you can beat the market all by yourself
[xviii] INTRODUCTION

I have included an Appendix section for those of you
with a higher level of financial training, but it is not necessary for people to read or understand the appendixes to
be able to understand and apply the methods found in this
book. The truth is that you don’t need an MBA to beat
the market. Knowing lots of sophisticated formulas or
financial terms isn’t what makes the difference. Understanding the simple concepts in this book . . . is.
So please enjoy this gift. May the small investment of
time (and 20 bucks or so) greatly enrich your future.
Good luck.
INTRODUCTION [xix]


Chapter One
JASON’S IN THE SIXTH GRADE, and he’s making a fortune.
My son and I see him almost every day on the way to
school. There’s Jason in the back of his chauffeur-driven
limousine, all decked out in cool clothes and dark sunglasses. Ahhh, to be 11 years old, rich, and cool. Now
that’s the life. Okay, maybe I’m getting a little carried
away. I mean, it’s not really a limousine; it’s kind of a
scooter. And the cool clothes and sunglasses part, well,
that’s not really true, either. It’s more like his belly hanging over a pair of jeans, no sunglasses, and what he had
for breakfast still stuck to his face. But that’s not my
point. Jason’s in business.

It’s a simple business, but it works. Jason buys gum,
four or five packs a day. It’s 25 cents for a pack and five
sticks of gum to a package. According to my son, once in
school, Jason transforms himself into a superhero of
sorts. Neither rain nor sleet nor evil hall monitors can
keep Jason from selling his gum. I guess his customers
like buying from a superhero (or maybe they’re just stuck
in school), but however he does it, Jason sells each stick
of gum for 25 cents. (Supposedly—I’ve never actually
seen it myself—Jason kind of shoves an open pack of gum
into a potential customer’s face and repeats “You want
some, you know you want some!” until his fellow student
either collapses or forks over a quarter.)
The way my son has it figured, that’s five sticks at 25
cents each, so Jason rakes in $1.25 for each pack he sells.
At a cost of 25 cents per pack, that means Jason is making $1 of pure profit on every pack he can shove ...I
mean, sell. At four or five packs a day, that’s a lot of
money! So after one of our daily Jason sightings, I asked
my sixth-grader, “Gee, how much do you think this guy
Jason can make by the end of high school?” My son—we’ll
call him Ben (even though his real name is Matt)—started
whizzing through the calculations using all his brainpower
(and a few fingers). “Let’s see,” he replied. “That’s, say,
four bucks a day, times five days a week. So, $20 a week,
36 weeks of school, that’s $720 a year. If he has six years
[2] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

left until he graduates, that’s somewhere over $4,000
more he’ll make by the end of high school!”
Not wanting to miss an opportunity to teach, I asked,
“Ben, if Jason offered to sell you half of his business, how
much would you pay? In other words, he’ll share half his
profits from the gum business with you over the six years
until he graduates, but he wants you to give him money
now. How much would you give him?”
“Well . . .”—I could see Ben’s wheels start to turn
now that there might be some real money on the line—
“maybe Jason doesn’t sell four or five packs a day, but
three packs—that’s a pretty safe bet. So maybe he makes
three bucks a day. That’s still $15 in a five-day school
week. So, 36 weeks in a school year, that’s 36 times 15 (I
might have helped a little in here), that’s over $500 a year.
Jason has six more years of school, so 6 times $500 is
$3,000 by the time he graduates!”
“Okay,” I said, “so I guess you’d pay Jason $1,500
for half of those profits, right?”
“No way,” Ben answered quickly. “First, why should
I pay $1,500 to get back $1,500? That doesn’t make any
sense. Besides, the $1,500 I get from Jason will take six
years to collect. Why would I give him $1,500 now to get
back $1,500 over six years? Also, maybe Jason does a little better than I figure and I get more than $1,500, but he
could do worse, too!”
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [3]

“Yeah,” I chimed in, “maybe other kids start to sell
gum in school, and Jason has so much competition he
can’t sell as much.”
“Nah, Jason’s practically a superhero,” Ben says. “I
don’t think anyone can sell as well as Jason, so I’m not too
worried about that.”
“So I see your point,” I responded. “Jason’s got a
good business, but $1,500 is too much to pay for half. But
what if Jason offered you half his business for $1? Would
you buy it then?”
“Of course,” Ben shot back with a “Dad, you’re
being an idiot” kind of tone.
“So, fine,” I said, ignoring the tone for a moment.
“The right price is somewhere between $1 and $1,500.
Now we’re getting closer, but how much would you
pay?”
“Four hundred fifty bucks. That’s how much I’d pay
today. If I collected $1,500 over the next six years, I think
that would be a good deal,” Ben said, evidently pleased
with his decision.
“Great!” I responded. “Now you finally understand
what I do for a living.”
“Dad, what the heck are you talking about? Now I’m
totally lost. I’ve never seen any gum!”
“No, Ben, I don’t sell gum. I spend my time figuring
out what businesses are worth, just like we did with
[4] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Jason’s business. If I can buy a business for a lot less than
I think it’s worth, I buy it!”
“Wait a second,” blurted out Ben. “That sounds too
easy. If a business is worth $1,000, why would anyone sell
it to you for $500?”
Well, as it turned out, Ben’s seemingly reasonable
and obvious question was actually the magic question that
got this whole project started. I told Ben that he had just
asked a great question, that believe it or not, there is a
place where they sell businesses at half price all the time.
I told him that I could teach him where to look and how
to buy those bargains for himself. But, of course, I told
him there was a catch.
The catch isn’t that the answer is incredibly complicated. It’s not. The catch isn’t that you have to be some
kind of genius or superspy to find $1,000 bills selling for
$500. You don’t. In fact, I decided to write this book so that
Ben and his siblings could not only understand what I do for
a living but also so that they could learn how to start finding
these bargain investments for themselves. I figure whatever
career they choose in the future (even if it’s not money management, a career I’m not necessarily encouraging), they’ll
definitely need to learn how to invest some of their earnings.
But, like I told Ben, there is a catch. The catch is that
you have to listen to a long story, you have to take the time
to understand the story, and most important, you have to
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [5]

actually believe that the story is true. In fact, the story even
concludes with a magic formula that can make you rich
over time. I kid you not. Unfortunately, if you don’t
believe the magic formula will make you rich, it won’t. On
the other hand, if you believe the story I’m going to tell
you—I mean really, truly believe—then you can choose to
make money with or without the formula. (The formula
will take significantly less time and effort than doing the
“work” yourself, and will provide better results for most
people, but you can decide which way to go when you’re
done reading.)
Okay, I know what you’re thinking. What’s this belief
stuff about? Are we talking about a new religion, maybe
something to do with Peter Pan or The Wizard of Oz? (I
won’t even bring up the witch-inside-the-crystal-ball thing
that still scares the heck out of me, or the flying monkeys,
mainly because neither has anything to do with my story.)
And what about the getting rich part, what’s that? Can a
book really teach you how to get rich? That doesn’t make
sense. If it could, everyone would be rich. That’s especially true for a book that claims to have a magic formula.
If everyone knows the magic formula and everyone can’t
be rich, pretty soon the formula will have to stop working.
But I told you this was a long story. I’m going to start
from the very beginning. For my kids and most others,
almost all of this stuff will be new. For adults, even if they
[6] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

think they know a lot about investing already, even if
they’ve been to graduate business school, and even if they
manage other people’s money professionally, most have
learned wrong. And they’ve learned wrong from the
beginning. Very few people really believe the story I’m
going to tell. I know this because if they did—if they
really, truly did—there would be a lot more successful
investors out there. There aren’t. I believe I can teach you
(and each of my children) to be one of them. So let’s get
started.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [7]

Chapter Two
ACTUALLY, JUST GETTING STARTED is a big deal. It takes a
great amount of discipline to save any money. After all, no
matter how much money you earn or receive from others,
it’s simply much easier and more immediately rewarding to
find something to spend it on. When I was young, I decided
that all my money should go to Johnson Smith. Of course,
I’d love to tell you that Johnson Smith was an orphan who
just needed a little help. I’d love to tell you that the money
given to Johnson Smith helped change his life. I’d love to
tell you that, but it wouldn’t be completely accurate. You
see, Johnson Smith was a company. Not just any company,
either. It was a company that sold whoopee cushions, itching powder, and imitation dog vomit through the mail.

I mean, I didn’t completely throw away all my money.
I did buy some educational stuff, too. Once, the guys at
Johnson Smith were able to sell me a weather balloon that
was 10 feet tall and 30 feet around. I’m not sure what a
giant balloon had to do with the weather, but it sounded
educational, sort of. Anyway, after my brother and I
finally figured out how to blow it up by somehow reversing the airflow on the vacuum cleaner, we ran into a big
problem. The 10-foot balloon was quite a bit larger than
our front door. Using a complicated formula that not even
Einstein could fully comprehend, we decided that if we
turned our backs and pushed really hard, the giant balloon could be squeezed out without bursting the balloon
or damaging the door (and besides, our mother wasn’t
home yet). And it worked, except we forgot one thing.
It seems that the air outside was colder than the air
inside our house. That meant that we had filled our balloon with warm air. And since, as everyone except apparently me and my brother knew, hot air rises, the balloon
started to float away. The two of us were left chasing a
giant balloon down the street for about half a mile before
it finally popped on a tree.
Luckily, I learned a valuable lesson from the whole
experience. Although I don’t exactly remember what that
was, I’m pretty sure it had something to do with the
importance of saving money for things that you might
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [9]

want or need in the future rather than wasting money buying giant weather balloons that you get to chase down the
block for all of three or four minutes.
But for our purposes, let’s assume that we can all agree
that it is important to save money for the future. Let’s also
assume that you have been able to resist the many temptations of the Johnson Smith people and the thousands of
other places calling out for your money; that you (or your
parents) have been able to provide for all of the necessities
of life, including food, clothing, and shelter; and that by
being careful about how much you spend, you have somehow been able to put aside at least a small amount of money.
Your challenge is to put that money—let’s say $1,000—
someplace where it can grow to be even more money.
Sounds simple enough. Sure, you can just put it under
your mattress or in your piggy bank, but when you come
to get it, even years later, you’ll still be left with the same
$1,000 you put there in the first place. It won’t grow at
all. In fact, if the prices of the things you were going to
buy with that money go up during the time your money
was just sitting there (and therefore your $1,000 will buy
less stuff than it used to), your money will actually be
worth less than it was worth the day you put it away. In
short, the mattress plan kind of stinks.
Plan B has got to be better. And it is. Just take that
$1,000 over to the bank. Not only will the bank agree to
[10] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

hold your money, they’ll pay you for the privilege. Each
year, you’ll collect interest from the bank, and in most
cases, the longer you agree to let them hold your money,
the higher the interest rate you’ll get. If you agree to keep
your $1,000 with the bank for five years, you might collect
something like 5 percent in interest payments per year. So
the first year you collect $50 in interest on your $1,000
original deposit, and now you will have $1,050 in the bank
at the beginning of year 2. In year 2, you collect another
5 percent interest on the new, higher total of $1,050, or
$52.50 in interest, and so on through year 5. After five
years, your $1,000 will grow into $1,276. Not bad, and
certainly a lot better than the mattress plan.
Which brings us to Plan C. This plan is known as “who
needs the bank?” There’s an easy way to just skip the bank
altogether and lend to businesses or to a group of individuals yourself. Often businesses borrow money directly by
selling bonds. The corner bakery won’t usually sell these,
but larger (multi-million-dollar) companies, such as McDonald’s, do it all the time. If you purchase a $1,000 bond from
a large company, for example, that company might agree to
pay you 8 percent each year and pay back your original
$1,000 after 10 years. That clearly beats the crummy 5 percent the bank was willing to pay you.
There’s one little problem, though: If you buy a bond
from one of these companies and something goes wrong
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [11]

with its business, you may never get your interest or your
money back. That’s why riskier companies—say, Bob’s
House of Flapjacks and Pickles—usually have to pay
higher interest rates than more solid, established ones.
That’s why a company’s bonds have to pay more than the
bank. People need to make more money on their bond to
make up for the risk that they may not receive the
promised interest rate or their original money back.
Of course, if you’re not comfortable taking any risk
of losing your $1,000, the U.S. government sells bonds,
too. While there is nothing completely riskless in this
world, lending money to the U.S. government is the closest any of us will ever get. If you are willing to lend the
U.S. government your money for 10 years, the government might, for example, agree to pay you something like
6 percent per year (if you lend for shorter periods of
time—say, five years—the rate will usually be lower,
maybe 4 or 5 percent).
For our purposes, the bond we’ll be looking at most is
the U.S. government bond that matures (pays off the
original loan) after 10 years. We’ll be looking at that one
because 10 years is a long time. We’ll want to compare
how much we can earn from a safe bet like a U.S. government bond with our other long-term investment
choices. So if the annual interest rate on the 10-year
[12] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

government bond is 6 percent, that essentially means that
people who are willing to lend their money out for 10
years, but are unwilling to take any risk of losing their
original investment or of not receiving the promised interest rate, can still expect to receive 6 percent each year on
their money. In other words, for people willing to lock
their money up for 10 years, the “no risk” rate of return
is 6 percent per year.
It’s important to understand what that means. It
means that if anyone asks you to loan them money or to
invest with them over the long term, they better expect to
pay you more than 6 percent a year. Why? Because you
can get 6 percent a year without taking any risk. All you
have to do is lend money to the U.S. government, and
they’ll guarantee that you receive your 6 percent each
and every year, along with all of your money back after 10
years. If Jason wants money for a share of his gum business, that investment better earn you more than 6 percent per year, or no way should you do it! If Jason wants
to borrow money over the long term, same deal. He better expect to pay you a lot more than 6 percent. After all,
you can get 6 percent risk free by lending to the U.S.
government!
And that’s it. There are only a few things you need to
remember from this chapter:
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [13]

Quick Summary
1. You can stick your money under the mattress. (But
that plan kind of stinks.)
2. You can put your money in the bank or buy bonds
from the U.S. government. You will be guaranteed
an interest rate and your money back with no risk.*
3. You can buy bonds sold by companies or other
groups. You will be promised higher interest rates
than you could get by putting your money in the
bank or by buying government bonds—but you
could lose some or all of your money, so you better
get paid enough for taking the risk.
4. You can do something else with your money. (We’ll
talk about what in the next chapter.)
And I almost forgot,
5. Hot air rises.
Hey, I did learn something from that balloon after all.
Thanks, Johnson Smith.
[14] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Bank deposits up to $100,000 are guaranteed by an agency of the U.S.
government. You must hold your bank deposit or your bond until it matures
(possibly 5 or 10 years, depending upon what you buy) to guarantee no loss
of your original investment.

T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [15]
I’m going to make your life even simpler. As I write
this, the 10-year U.S. government bond rate is substantially lower than 6 percent. However, whenever
the long-term government bond is paying less than 6
percent, we will still assume the rate is 6 percent. In
other words, our other investment alternatives will, at
a minimum, still have to beat 6 percent, no matter
how low long-term U.S. government bond interest
rates go. The big picture is that we want to make sure
we earn a lot more from our other investments than
we could earn without taking any risk. Obviously, if
long-term U.S. government bond rates rose to 7 percent or higher, we would use 7 percent or that higher
number. Now that’s really it.

Chapter Three
OKAY. WHAT ELSE CAN YOU DO with your money? Let’s face
it: Putting money in the bank or lending it to the government is really boring. Hey, I know! Why don’t we just go
to the track and bet it all on a horse! Nah, I actually tried
that—didn’t work out too well. I even tried the dog races.
That’s where a bunch of greyhound dogs run around in a
circle chasing a little mechanical rabbit. It’s fun to watch,
and you get to hang out with some really great people.
Some of them even have teeth!
You know what, though—on second thought, maybe
that’s not such a good idea, either. I kind of figured it
wasn’t for me after my dog actually caught the rabbit. My
little guy got trampled by the other dogs on the first turn,

got up, and started running the wrong way. Unfortunately, the mechanical rabbit zips around the track at
about 60 miles an hour, and when my dog, the one I had
placed my faith in and my money on, took a flying leap at
the rabbit speeding toward him . . . let’s just say it wasn’t
pretty (all right, since you’re probably concerned—the
dog slammed into the 60-mile-per-hour rabbit at full
speed, flew 30 feet in the air, and was tragically disqualified, which meant, alas, I had lost all of my money).*
In any case, now that we’ve explored most of the logical alternatives for your money (though I’m sure they
race worms and various crustaceans some place I haven’t
found yet), let’s look at one more. How about investing in
a business? After all, Jason’s going to grow up someday.
Maybe he’ll open up his own gum store. Better yet, maybe
he’ll open up a whole bunch of gum stores (usually
referred to as a “chain” of stores) under some catchy
name like Jason’s Gum Shops.
Let’s assume that Jason personally trains all the salespeople in his unique brand of gum selling and that the
chain is wildly successful (it could happen). Now Jason
comes to you willing to sell half his business (he wants to
buy a new pair of sunglasses, a real limousine, and maybe
a house for himself and the lucky Mrs. Jason). Only now
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [17]
*And yes, the dog was fine.

he’s asking for big bucks, and we’ll have to do some serious figuring before we can decide whether to take Jason
up on his offer.
It turns out that Jason’s grown up quite a bit since the
days when he scootered himself around town, and he now
wants a hefty $6 million for half ownership of his business.
Of course, 6 million bucks is more than most of us can
afford, but, luckily, Jason isn’t looking to sell half ownership of his business all to one person. In fact, Jason has
decided to divide ownership of his business into a million
equal pieces, or shares (as they’re referred to on Wall
Street). Jason’s plan is to keep 500,000 shares for himself
and sell his other 500,000 shares for $12 apiece, or $6
million in total. Anyone interested in buying part of
Jason’s business at that price can buy one share (for $12),
a hundred shares (for $1,200), a thousand shares (for
$12,000), or pretty much any number of shares they want.
If you were to buy, for example, 10,000 shares costing
$120,000, you would then own 1 percent of Jason’s Gum
Shops (10,000 shares divided by the 1-million-share total).
That 1 percent doesn’t mean that you would own the
spearmint gum department or a small piece of one of
Jason’s stores. Your 10,000 shares, or 1 percent ownership, of Jason’s Gum Shops means that you would be entitled to 1 percent of the future earnings of the entire
Jason’s Gum Shops business. Now, of course, all you
[18] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

would have to do is figure out whether paying $120,000 for
1 percent of Jason’s future gum profits is a good deal.
(This is where our analysis gets a little sticky; we have to
be good gumshoes so we don’t blow it and have our money
chewed up and spit out. . . . Anyway, you get the idea.)
Luckily, Jason has provided us with a lot of information. Since we already know that Jason wants $12 for each
share in Jason’s Gum Shops and that there are 1 million
shares in total (this is referred to as 1 million shares outstanding), this means that Jason thinks his business is
worth $12 million (and therefore he thinks that 1 percent
of his business is worth the $120,000 we just talked
about). Well, that’s all fine and dandy, but what matters
here is what we think it’s worth. So let’s take a look at
some of the other information Jason has given us.
It seems that last year Jason sold a total of $10 million
worth of gum from the 10 stores in the highly successful
Jason’s Gum Shops chain. Of course, the $10 million is
how much gum Jason’s stores sold, but unfortunately, $10
million isn’t how much profit Jason made. Obviously,
Jason’s stores ran up a few expenses along the way. Naturally, there was the cost of the gum that Jason sold—that
totaled $6 million. That left him with $4 million in profits. But wait, we’re far from finished.
There was the rent Jason had to pay for the use of his
10 store locations; then there were those pesky employees
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [19]

who for some reason expected to get paid for selling gum
and keeping the stores clean and running smoothly; there
were electricity and heating costs, trash removal, and
accounting and all kinds of administrative costs (so Jason
could keep track of all the money and gum flying all over
the place)—and that stuff adds up. In this case, another $2
million in expenses to be exact. That got Jason’s business
down to $2 million in profits. But as you suspected, we’re
not done yet.
Jason’s business had to pay taxes. The government
needs money to provide services to its citizens, and profitable businesses must pay their share of taxes to keep it
going. In the case of Jason’s Gum Shops, that tax is equal
to 40 percent of income (a fairly standard rate for many
businesses). So 40 percent of the $2 million in profits that
Jason’s gum business earned last year had to go to the
government in the form of taxes. Since 40 percent of $2
million is $800,000, that left Jason’s Gum Shops with a
net profit of $1.2 million.
Actually, Jason provided us with all that information
about last year’s income in a very neat table, known as an
income statement (see Table 3.1).
So there you have it. Jason’s Gum Shops earned $1.2
million last year. Jason thinks that makes the business
worth a total of $12 million. He is willing to sell us a piece
of that business, in any size up to half the entire business,
[20] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

at that $12 million valuation (i.e., $6 million for half, $1.2
million for a 10 percent stake, $120,000 for 1 percent
ownership, and one share equaling one-millionth of the
business for a measly $12). Should we do it? To keep it
simple, let’s take a look at what we’ll be getting for each
$12 share.
Well, Jason has divided his business into 1 million
equal shares. That means, if the whole business earned
$1,200,000, each share earned one-millionth of that
amount. Since $1,200,000 divided by 1,000,000 is $1.20,
each $12 share was entitled to $1.20 in earnings. Is that a
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [21]
TABLE 3.1 Jason’s Gum Shops Annual Income Statement
(For the Last 12 Months)
Total sales $10,000,000
Cost of goods sold
(i.e., the gum) −6,000,000
Gross profit 4,000,000
Selling, general, &
administrative expenses −2,000,000
Income before taxes 2,000,000
Taxes (@40%) −800,000
Net income $1,200,000

good deal? Let’s look at it this way. If we invest $12 for a
piece of Jason’s business and it earns us $1.20 in the first
year, our first-year return on our investment would be
$1.20/$12, or 10%
A 10 percent return in our first year! Pretty darn
good, right? In Chapter 2 we discussed that, at the very
least, we had to beat the 6 percent annual return from a
10-year U.S. government bond. That’s because buying
those bonds would earn us 6 percent without having to
take any risk. Since earning 10 percent is clearly more
than earning 6 percent, ipso fatso, is it then true that paying $12 for a share that earns $1.20 a good deal?
Well, life isn’t quite that simple (but as we’ll see in a
later chapter, almost!). The bottom line is—we’re off to a
great start, but we have to consider a few more things
before we can make up our mind.
First, $1.20 per share is what Jason’s Gum Shops
earned last year. We have to determine whether we think
the business will earn that $1.20 in the coming year—or
more than that—or maybe less. Last year’s earnings may be
a good starting point for estimating next year’s earnings,
but it may not. If Jason’s Gum Shops doesn’t earn $1.20
next year, the business won’t be earning that 10 percent
[22] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

we expected on the $12 per share we just paid—it could be
higher—but it could be lower.
Second, once we come up with our estimate for how
much Jason’s business will earn next year, we have to
determine how confident we are in our prediction. If we’re
taking a wild guess because we have no idea whether gum
sales are steady from year to year, whether Jason’s gum
stores are just a fad, or whether new competition from
other candy stores will affect Jason’s profits, then our
estimate may be suspect. But we have to be reasonable. If
we’re not sure whether earnings will be $1.50 or $2.00
per share, that kind of uncertainty is fine. Both of those
numbers will represent that Jason’s business is earning
more than that 10 percent on our initial $12-per-share
cost. On the other hand, if we’re uncertain whether the
earnings will be 20 cents per share or $1.20, then our
guaranteed 6 percent from the government bond may
start to look a whole lot better.
The third little detail we haven’t yet considered is that
next year is only one year. Even if Jason’s Gum Shops
earns $1.20 next year (or a lot more or a lot less), what
about all the years after that? Will earnings keep growing
every year? Maybe each store will keep selling more gum
each year, and earnings will increase that way. Or maybe
if 10 stores can make $1.20 per share, getting to 20 stores
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [23]

in a few years will cause earnings to grow to $2.40 per
share or even higher? Of course, the gum business could
always turn sour (sorry) in the next few years, causing
gum earnings to remain stuck at levels well below $1.20
for a long time. And there’s more . . .
Okay, you’re beginning to panic. I can feel it. This
stuff is too hard. How are you going to figure it all out?
How can anyone? And even if you take your best shot, am
I expecting you (and my kids, for that matter) to “gamble”
real money on a pile of guesses and estimates? And, oh
yeah, aren’t there tons of MBAs, PhDs, smart financial
types, and professional investment analysts, not to mention full-time money managers, trying to figure out pretty
much the same things? How can little old you compete
with all those hardworking, smart, sophisticated guys?
All right already, enough, calm down. Sheesh, can’t I
take you anywhere? Have a little faith. Hang in there. I’ll
do that summary thing, tell you what’s important to
remember, and we’ll move on. Man, if I have to hold your
hand for every little thing . . .
So, here’s what you need to know:
1. Buying a share in a business means you are purchasing a portion (or percentage interest) of that
business. You are then entitled to a portion of that
business’s future earnings.
[24] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

2. Figuring out what a business is worth involves estimating (okay, guessing) how much the business will
earn in the future.
3. The earnings from your share of the profits must
give you more money than you would receive by
placing that same amount of money in a risk-free
10-year U.S. government bond. (Remember: Last
chapter we set 6 percent as your absolute minimum
annual return when government bond rates fall
below 6 percent) and
4. No, I haven’t forgotten about the magic formula.
But you’re going to have to stop bugging me about
it, okay? Sheesh!
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [25]

Chapter Four
GREAT, FIGURING OUT WHAT A BUSINESS is worth isn’t easy.
After lots of guessing and estimating, maybe you get it
right and maybe you get it wrong. But what if you could?
What if you could figure out what a business was really
worth? Is there something you could do with that information? Is there really a place like I promised in the first
chapter, a place where you can buy a business for half its
true value? A place where you can get $1,000 of value for
only $500? You bet there is. But first, let’s spend a few
minutes in business school.
For the past nine years, I have taught an investing
course to a group of graduate business students at an Ivy
League university. Needless to say, this is a pretty smart

group of students. Each year, on the first day of class, I
walk in and open the newspaper to the financial section.
Found there are pages and pages of tables with lots of
numbers in tiny print. (Sounds great so far, right?) Anyway, posted in these tables is a list of company names, and
next to each name is a bunch of prices.
“Call out the name of a big, well-known company,” I
say. The students come up with companies like General
Electric, IBM, General Motors, and Abercrombie &
Fitch. Actually, it doesn’t really matter what companies
the students shout out. My main point is so easy to
make, any company name in almost any industry, large or
small, well-known or not, will do. The result is always
the same.
I look in the paper next to General Electric and read
off the numbers. “It says here that the price for one share
of General Electric was $35 yesterday. It also says here
that the highest price that General Electric shares have
sold for over the last year was $53 per share. The lowest
price for a share over the last year was $29.
“For IBM, it’s the same thing. You could have purchased one share of IBM yesterday for $85. Over the past
year, shares of IBM have sold for as much as $93 and for
as little as $55.
“General Motors sold for $37 per share yesterday.
But over the last year, shares have sold for between $30
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [27]

and $68. For Abercrombie & Fitch, which was selling for
$27 per share yesterday, the range of prices per share over
the last year has been between $15 per share at the lowest
and just over $33 per share for a high price.”
I then point out that that’s a pretty wide range of prices
for shares and a pretty short period of time for them to
change so much. Looking at the price for shares over a twoto three-year period would give us an even wider range.
So here’s the question that I always ask: How can this
be? These are big, well-known companies. Each of these
companies has divided its ownership into millions (and
sometimes billions) of equal shares, just like Jason did
with his gum shops. Initially, companies sell their shares
to the public (to both individuals and big institutional
investors). After that, though, the people who buy these
shares are free to sell them to anyone they want.
Each day the newspaper lists the names of thousands
of companies and the price at which people have been
buying and selling an ownership share in each. The trading back and forth of these ownership shares takes place
in a number of locations and over computer networks.
These ownership shares are referred to as shares of stock,
and collectively, this buying and selling activity is referred
to as the stock market.
A company as large as IBM or General Motors might
have divided its ownership stake into something like a
[28] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

billion equal shares. That means that if at one point during the year you can purchase one share of General
Motors for $30 (and for our example we assume the ownership of General Motors has been divided into 1 billion
equal pieces, or shares), then the implied price to purchase the entire company (all 1 billion shares) would be
$30 billion. However, if at some point during the same
year, General Motors shares could have been purchased
for $60 each, that would indicate that the cost to purchase
all of General Motors would be $60 billion.
So I ask the question again: How can this be? Can the
value of General Motors, the largest car manufacturer in
North America, change that much within the same year?
Can a company that large be worth $30 billion one day
and then a few months later be worth $60 billion? Are
they selling twice as many cars, making twice as much
money, or doing something drastically different in their
business to justify such a large change in value? Of
course, it’s possible. But what about the big price changes
in IBM, Abercrombie & Fitch, and General Electric?
Does something happen each and every year to account
for large changes in the value of most companies?
Remember, every year the results are the same. For
pretty much any company that my students name, the
range of high and low prices, over the course of only one
year, is huge. Does this make sense? Well, to save the
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [29]

class time (and since my attention span is usually a matter
of seconds), I usually blurt out the answer. No! It makes
no sense that the values of most companies swing wildly
from high to low, or low to high, during the course of
each and every year. On the other hand, it seems pretty
clear that the prices of the shares in most companies swing
around wildly each and every year. All you have to do is
look in the newspaper to see that that’s true.
So I ask my room full of smart, sophisticated students to try to explain why. Why do the prices of all these
businesses move around so much each year if the values
of their businesses can’t possibly change that much?
Well, it’s a good question, so I generally let my students
spend some time offering up complicated explanations
and theories.
In fact, it’s such a good question that professors
have developed whole fields of economic, mathematical,
and social study to try to explain it. Even more incredible, most of this academic work has involved coming up
with theories as to why something that clearly makes no
sense, actually makes sense. You have to be really smart
to do that.
So why do share prices move around so much every
year when it seems clear that the values of the underlying
businesses do not? Well, here’s how I explain it to my
students: Who knows and who cares?
[30] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Maybe people go nuts a lot. Maybe it’s hard to predict future earnings. Maybe it’s hard to decide what a fair
rate of return on your purchase price is. Maybe people
get a little depressed sometimes and don’t want to pay a
lot for stuff. Maybe people get excited sometimes and are
willing to pay a lot. So maybe people simply justify high
prices by making high estimates for future earnings when
they are happy and justify low prices by making low estimates when they are sad.
But like I said, maybe people just go nuts a lot (still
my favorite). The truth is that I don’t really have to know
why people are willing to buy and sell shares of most companies at wildly different prices over very short periods of
time. I just have to know that they do! Why is this helpful?
Let’s think about that.
Suppose you figured that a business (perhaps one like
Jason’s Gum Shops) was worth between $10 and $12 per
share, and at varying times during the year, its shares
could be purchased for between $6 and $11. Well, if you
were confident about your estimate of what the business
was worth, then deciding whether to buy shares when they
were trading near $11 might be a difficult decision. But
when shares in that same company during that same year
were available at close to $6, your decision might well
become much easier! At $6 per share, if your estimates of
value were close to correct, then you would be buying
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [31]

shares in Jason’s Gum Shops for only 50 or 60 cents on
the dollar (for 50 or 60 percent of what they were truly
worth).
One of the greatest stock market writers and
thinkers, Benjamin Graham, put it this way. Imagine that
you are partners in the ownership of a business with a
crazy guy named Mr. Market. Mr. Market is subject to
wild mood swings. Each day he offers to buy your share
of the business or sell you his share of the business at a
particular price. Mr. Market always leaves the decision
completely to you, and every day you have three choices.
You can sell your shares to Mr. Market at his stated
price, you can buy Mr. Market’s shares at that same
price, or you can do nothing.
Sometimes Mr. Market is in such a good mood that
he names a price that is much higher than the true worth
of the business. On those days, it would probably make
sense for you to sell Mr. Market your share of the business. On other days, he is in such a poor mood that he
names a very low price for the business. On those days,
you might want to take advantage of Mr. Market’s crazy
offer to sell you shares at such a low price and to buy Mr.
Market’s share of the business. If the price named by Mr.
Market is neither very high nor extraordinarily low relative to the value of the business, you might very logically
choose to do nothing.
[32] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

In the world of the stock market, that’s exactly how it
works. The stock market is Mr. Market! If, according to
the daily newspaper, General Motors is selling for $37 per
share, you have three choices: You can buy shares in General Motors for $37 each, you can sell your shares in General Motors and receive $37 each, or you can do nothing.
If you think GM is really worth $70 per share, then you
might consider $37 a ridiculously low price and decide to
buy some shares. If you think GM is really worth only $30
or $35 per share (and you happen to own some shares),
you might decide to sell to “Mr. Market” at $37. If you
think each share of General Motors is worth between $40
and $45 per share, you may decide to do nothing. At $37
per share, the price is not at a big enough discount for you
to buy, nor is $37 a generous enough offer to make you
want to sell.
In short, you are never required to act. You alone can
choose to act only when the price offered by Mr. Market
appears very low (when you might decide to buy some
shares) or extremely high (when you might consider selling any shares you own to Mr. Market).
Graham referred to this practice of buying shares of a
company only when they trade at a large discount to true
value as investing with a margin of safety. The difference
between your estimated value per share of, say, $70 and
the purchase price of your shares of perhaps $37 would
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [33]

represent a margin of safety for your investment. If your
original calculations of the value of shares in a company
like General Motors were too high or the car business
unexpectedly took a turn for the worse after your purchase, the margin of safety in your original purchase price
could still protect you from losing money.
Even if you originally estimated fair value to be $70,
and it turned out that $60 or even $50 was closer to the
true value for each share, a purchase price of $37 would
leave enough margin for you to still make money on your
original investment! Graham figured that always using the
margin of safety principle when deciding whether to purchase shares of a business from a crazy partner like Mr.
Market was the secret to making safe and reliable investment profits. In fact, these two concepts—requiring a
margin of safety for your investment purchases and viewing the stock market as if it were a partner like Mr. Market—have been used with much success by some of the
greatest investors of all time.
But wait! There’s still a problem here. Okay, maybe a
few. First, as we discussed, how are you supposed to know
what a business is worth? If you can’t place a fair value on
a company, then you can’t divide that number by the number of shares that exist, and you can’t figure out what the
fair value of a share of stock is. So even if a share of General Motors sells for $30 on one day and $60 per share a
[34] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

few months later, you have no idea whether one of those
prices is cheap and one is expensive or both are cheap or
both expensive, or whatever! In short, from what we’ve
learned so far, you wouldn’t know a bargain price if it hit
you in the head!
Second, if you could figure out a fair price or price
range for the business, how would you know whether you
were right, or even close to right? Remember, in the
process of figuring out the value of a business, all you do
is make a bunch of guesses and estimates. Those estimates involve predicting earnings for a business for many
years into the future. Even experts (whatever that means)
have a tough time doing that.
Third, as we already covered, aren’t there tons of
smart, hardworking people trying to figure out all this
stuff, too? Aren’t there lots of stock market analysts and
professional investors who spend their time trying to figure out what companies are really worth? Even if I could
really teach you how to invest, wouldn’t these smart,
knowledgeable, and experienced people be better at it
than you? Wouldn’t these people scoop up all of the obvious bargains before you got there? How can you compete
with those guys? All you did was buy a book—a book that
says even kids (okay, teenagers) can learn how to make big
money in the stock market. Does that make sense? What
chance do you really have?
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [35]

Well, a sane person might start to feel a little foolish
about now. But you paid good money for this book! You
could already be a few cards short of a full deck. So at
least we’ve got that going for us! In any case, ready or
not, here comes the summary:
1. Stock prices move around wildly over very short
periods of time. This does not mean that the values
of the underlying companies have changed very
much during that same period. In effect, the stock
market acts very much like a crazy guy named Mr.
Market.
2. It is a good idea to buy shares of a company at a big
discount to your estimated value of those shares.
Buying shares at a large discount to value will provide you with a large margin of safety and lead to
safe and consistently profitable investments.
3. From what we’ve learned so far, you wouldn’t know
a bargain-priced stock if it hit you in the head.
4. Being a few cards short of a full deck, you might as
well keep reading.
[36] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Chapter Five
I LOVE MOVIES, and The Karate Kid is one of my favorites.
Of course, I would like any art form where eating popcorn
and candy are part of the deal. But there is one scene in
this particular movie that holds special meaning for me. In
it, the old karate master, Mr. Miyagi, is supposed to be
teaching his teenage apprentice, Daniel, how to fight.
The boy is new at school and being bullied by a group of
karate-trained toughs. Daniel hopes learning karate will
help him stand up to his tormentors and win the girl of his
dreams. But instead of teaching him karate, Mr. Miyagi
puts Daniel to work—waxing cars, painting fences, and
sanding floors.

So after a whirlwind of scenes showing poor Daniel
working his fingers to the bone—waxing, painting, and
sanding—the youth has finally had enough. He confronts
Mr. Miyagi and essentially says, “Why am I wasting my
time doing these simple and menial tasks when I should be
learning karate?” Mr. Miyagi has Daniel stand up from his
sanding duties and starts throwing jabs at the young boy
while yelling “Wax on! Wax off!” Daniel deflects each jab
with the swirling motions he learned from so many hours
waxing cars. Next, Mr. Miyagi throws a punch while
yelling “Paint the fence.” Once again, Daniel deflects the
punch, this time using the up-and-down action of painting
a fence. Similarly, Mr. Miyagi’s karate kick is then stopped
by Daniel’s expert floor-sanding ability.
In effect, by learning these few simple techniques,
Daniel has unwittingly become a karate master. Now in
good movies, the viewer participates in something called
the willing suspension of disbelief. In other words, we kind of
know that Ralph Macchio, the actor who plays Daniel in
the movie, couldn’t really use that waxing thing to defend
himself in a dark alley. In the real world, before he could
finish his first coat, Mr. Macchio would probably get
smacked in the head and drop like a sack of potatoes. But
while caught up in a movie, we’re ready and more than
willing to believe that Mr. Miyagi’s simple methods can
truly work wonders.
[38] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Well, I’m going to have to ask you to do a little suspending of disbelief, too. Not because what you’re going
to learn doesn’t make sense. On the contrary, the two
concepts in this chapter are simple and obvious. It’s just
that these two concepts are so very basic, you’ll have a
hard time believing that such simple tools can turn you
into a stock market master. But pay close attention now,
and I promise you won’t get a smack in the head later.
When we last left Jason, the hero of our story, he had
just asked us to chew over an exciting proposal. His proposal was simple: Would we want to buy a piece of his
wildly successful chain of gum stores, Jason’s Gum Shops?
(You want some, you know you want some . . .) But as
much as Jason wanted to sell us a piece of his business, giving him an answer wasn’t turning out to be so simple.
By looking at the income statement that Jason had provided us, it turned out that Jason’s chain of 10 gum shops
had earned a total of $1.2 million last year—pretty impressive. Since Jason had divided his business into 1 million
equal shares, we had concluded that each share was therefore entitled to $1.20 in earnings ($1,200,000 divided by
1,000,000 shares). At Jason’s asking price of $12 for each
share, that meant that based on last year’s earnings,
Jason’s Gum Shops would have given us a 10 percent
return for each $12 share purchased ($1.20 divided by
$12 = 10 percent).
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [39]

That 10 percent return, calculated by dividing the
earnings per share for the year by the share price, is
known as the earnings yield. We then compared the earnings yield of 10 percent we could receive from an investment in Jason’s business with the 6 percent return we
could earn risk free from investing in a 10-year U.S. government bond. We concluded, without too much trouble,
that earning 10 percent per year on our investment was
better than earning 6 percent. Of course, although that
analysis was simple, we identified a bunch of problems.
First, Jason’s Gum Shops earned that $1.20 per share
last year. Next year’s earnings might turn out to be a completely different story. If Jason’s business earned less than
$1.20 next year, we wouldn’t earn a 10 percent return on
our investment and maybe we would be better off with a
sure 6 percent from the government bond. Second, even
if Jason’s business did earn the $1.20 per share next year,
or even more, that’s only one year. How do we know, or
how would we ever know, how much Jason’s Gum Shops
would earn in future years? It could be a lot more than
$1.20 per share, but it could be a lot less, and our earnings yield could drop significantly below the 6 percent we
could have earned risk free from the U.S. government.
Lastly, even if we had an opinion about future earnings,
how could we ever have any confidence that our predictions would turn out to be right?
[40] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

In short, all of our problems seem to boil down to
this: It’s hard to predict the future. If we can’t predict the
future earnings of a business, then it’s hard to place a
value on that business. If we can’t value a business, then
even if Mr. Market goes crazy sometimes and offers us
unbelievable bargain prices, we won’t recognize them. But
rather than focusing on all the things that we don’t know,
let’s go over a couple of the things that we do know.
As we discussed, Jason’s Gum Shops earned $1.20 per
share last year. At a price of $12 per share, our earnings
yield was therefore $1.20 divided by $12, or 10 percent—
easy enough. But what if Jason’s Gum Shops earned $2.40
per share last year? What if we could still buy a share for
$12? What would the earnings yield be then? Well, $2.40
divided by $12 equals 20 percent. Therefore, if Jason’s
Gum Shops had earned $2.40 per share last year, at a price
of $12 per share, the earnings yield would be 20 percent.
If Jason’s Gum Shops had earned $3.60 per share last
year, at a price of $12 per share, the earnings yield would
be 30 percent! But it gets easier.
Now follow closely because there are only two main
points in this chapter and here comes the question that
will determine whether you understand the first. All
things being equal, if you could buy a share of Jason’s
Gum Shops for $12, which of those earnings results
would you prefer? Would you prefer that Jason’s Gum
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [41]

Shops had earned $1.20 per share last year, $2.40 per
share last year, or $3.60 per share last year? In other
words, would you prefer that the earnings yield calculated
using last year’s earnings was 10 percent, 20 percent, or
30 percent? Drumroll, please. If you answered that 30
percent is obviously better than 20 percent and 10 percent, you would be correct! And that’s the point—you
would rather have a higher earnings yield than a lower
one; you would rather the business earn more relative to
the price you are paying than less! Wax on!
Now that wasn’t so hard, but here comes the second
point of the chapter, which focuses on something a bit different from the first (otherwise, I would be saying the
same thing twice, which would be wasting your time,
which is something I would never do unless I put it in
parentheses). The first point related to price—how much
we receive in earnings relative to our purchase price. In
other words, is the purchase price a bargain or not? But
beyond price, we might also want to know something
about the nature of the business itself. In short, are we
buying a good business or a bad business?
Of course, there are plenty of ways we could define
what makes a business either good or bad. Among other
things, we could look at the quality of its products or
services, the loyalty of its customers, the value of its
brands, the efficiency of its operations, the talent of its
[42] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

management, the strength of its competitors, or the longterm prospects of its business. Obviously, any of these criteria, either alone or in combination, would be helpful in
evaluating whether we were purchasing a good or a bad
business. All of these assessments would also involve making guesses, estimates, and/or predictions. As we already
agreed, that’s a pretty hard thing to do.
So once again it might make sense to first examine
some things that we already know. In fact, let’s not make
any predictions at all. Instead, let’s just look at what happened last year. For instance, what if we found out that it
cost Jason $400,000 to build each of his gum stores
(including inventory, store displays, etc.) and that each of
those stores earned him $200,000 last year. That would
mean, at least based on last year’s results, that a typical
store in the Jason’s Gum Shops chain earns $200,000
each year from an initial investment of only $400,000.
This works out to a 50 percent yearly return ($200,000
divided by $400,000) on the initial cost of opening a gum
store. This result is often referred to as a 50 percent
return on capital. Without knowing much else, earning
$200,000 each year from a store that costs $400,000 to
build sounds like a pretty good business. But here comes
the hard part (not really).
What if Jason had a friend, Jimbo, who also owned a
chain of stores? What if you had a chance to buy a piece
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [43]

of Jimbo’s store chain, Just Broccoli? What if it also cost
Jimbo $400,000 to open a new store? But what if each of
those stores earned only $10,000 last year? Earning
$10,000 a year from a store that costs you $400,000 to
build works out to a one-year return of only 2.5 percent,
or a 2.5 percent return on capital. So here’s the tough
question: Which business sounds better? Jason’s Gum
Shops, a business where each store earned $200,000 last
year and cost $400,000 to build, or Just Broccoli, a business where each store earned $10,000 last year but also
cost $400,000 to build? In other words, which sounds
better—a business that earns a 50 percent return on capital or one that earns a 2.5 percent return on capital? Of
course, the answer is obvious—and that’s the second
point! You would rather own a business that earns a high
return on capital than one that earns a low return on capital! Wax off (or paint the fence or sand something or
whatever)!*
But here comes the big finish. Remember how I told
you this chapter was going to be hard to believe? That by
using just two simple tools you could actually become a
“stock market master”? Well, believe it. You are a stock
market master.
[44] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*To find out what Jimbo should do, check out the box at the end of the
chapter!

How? Well, as you’ll see next chapter, it turns out
that if you just stick to buying good companies (ones that have
a high return on capital) and to buying those companies only at
bargain prices (at prices that give you a high earnings yield),
you can end up systematically buying many of the good companies that crazy Mr. Market has decided to literally give away.
You can achieve investment returns that beat the pants off
even the best investment professionals (including the
smartest professional I know). You can beat the returns of
top-notch professors and outperform every academic
study ever done. In fact, you can more than double the
annual returns of the stock market averages!
But there’s more. You can do it all by yourself. You
can do it with low risk. You can do it without making any
predictions. You can do it by following a simple formula
that uses only the two basic concepts you just learned in
this chapter. You can do it for the rest of your life—and
you can choose to do it only after you are convinced that
it really works.
Hard to believe? Well, it’s my job to prove it. Your job
is to take the time to read and understand that the only reason this simple method actually works is that it makes perfect sense! But first, as always, here comes the summary:
1. Paying a bargain price when you purchase a share in
a business is a good thing. One way to do this is to
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [45]

purchase a business that earns more relative to the
price you are paying rather than less. In other
words, a higher earnings yield is better than a lower
one.
2. Buying a share of a good business is better than
buying a share of a bad business. One way to do
this is to purchase a business that can invest its own
money at high rates of return rather than purchasing a business that can only invest at lower ones. In
other words, businesses that earn a high return on
capital are better than businesses that earn a low
return on capital.
3. Combining points 1 and 2, buying good businesses
at bargain prices is the secret to making lots of
money.
And most important,
4. Don’t give money to guys named Jimbo.
[46] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [47]
In fact, unless Jimbo expects those Just Broccoli
stores to earn a lot more in the coming years (a presumption that would obviously involve making predictions about the future), it seems pretty clear that
Jimbo’s business is so bad he shouldn’t even be building Just Broccoli stores. If he has a choice of building
a new store for $400,000 that will earn him just 2.5
percent each year on his investment or buying a U.S.
government bond that will earn him 6 percent on his
investment—risk free—what’s the point of even building a store in the first place? By opening Just Broccoli stores, Jimbo is actually throwing money away!
(Even though it looks like he is earning 2.5 percent
on his investment in a new store, in reality he is
throwing away the added 3.5 percent he could earn by
simply buying a risk-free U.S. government bond!)

Chapter Six
SO WE’RE READY FOR the magic formula! Of course, you’re
still probably thinking it won’t work or it’ll be too hard or
there’s something wrong with a book that even claims to
have a magic formula. But if it makes you feel any better,
even the great Benjamin Graham, one of the most
respected and influential pioneers in the investment field,
the man who introduced us to the concepts of Mr. Market and margin of safety, wrote about and used a magic
formula of his own. Okay, so he didn’t really call it that
(apparently, the man had some dignity). But Graham felt
that most individual investors, and even many professional
investors, would have a hard time making the type of predictions and performing the level of analysis necessary to

value and invest in businesses on their own. Graham figured that by sharing a simple formula, one that made
sense and had worked well in the past, individual investors
would be able to achieve excellent investment results with
a high degree of safety.
Graham’s formula involved purchasing companies
whose stock prices were so low that the purchase price
was actually lower than the proceeds that would be received from simply shutting down the business and selling
off the company’s assets in a fire sale (he called these
stocks by various names: bargain issues, net-current-asset
stocks, or stocks selling below their net liquidation value).
Graham stated that it seems “ridiculously simple to say”
that if one could buy a group of 20 or 30 companies that
were cheap enough to meet the strict requirements of his
formula, without doing any further analysis, the “results
should be quite satisfactory.” In fact, Graham used this formula with much success for over 30 years.
Unfortunately, the formula was designed during a
period when many stocks were priced cheaply. For several
decades after the stock market crash of 1929 and the
Great Depression that followed, investing in stocks was
considered to be an extremely risky business. Investors,
for the most part, were therefore unwilling to place a high
value on stocks for fear of losing their money again.
Although Graham’s formula has continued to work over
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [49]

the years, especially during periods when stock prices are
particularly depressed, in today’s markets there are usually few, if any, stocks that meet the strict requirements of
Graham’s original formula.
But that’s okay. By using his formula successfully for
so many years, Graham showed that a simple system for
finding obviously cheap stocks could lead to safe and consistently good investment returns. If Mr. Market was willing to sell him a group of stocks at prices so low that they
met his formula’s strict requirements, Graham figured
that on average he would end up owning a basket of bargains. Sure, the low prices of some of the stocks would be
justified. Some companies deserve low prices because
their future prospects are poor. But on average, Graham figured that the purchases made by using his formula would be bargains—bargains created by Mr. Market practically giving away
businesses at unreasonably low prices. Graham suggested that
by buying a group of these bargain stocks, investors could
safely earn a high return without worrying about a few
bad purchases and without doing complicated analysis of
individual stocks.
Of course, that leaves us with an obvious challenge.
Can we come up with a new formula, one that can beat the
market averages with low risk? Can we find one that not
only works in today’s market but one that is flexible
enough to work far into the future—regardless of the
[50] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

overall level of the market? Well, as you might have
guessed, we can. In fact, you already know what it is!
Last chapter we learned that, all things being equal, if
we have the choice of buying a stock with a high earnings
yield (one that earns a lot relative to the price we are paying) or buying one with a low earnings yield (one that
earns very little relative to the price we are paying), we
might as well choose the one with the high earnings yield.
We also learned that, all things being equal, if the choice
is between buying shares in a company that earns a high
return on capital (a company whose stores or factories
earn a lot relative to the cost to build them) and buying
shares in a company that earns a low return on capital (a
company whose stores or factories earn very little relative
to the cost to build them, like Just Broccoli), we might as
well choose the one with the high return on capital!
So here it comes. What do you think would happen if
we simply decided to buy shares in companies that had
both a high earnings yield and a high return on capital? In
other words, what would happen if we decided to only buy
shares in good businesses (ones with high returns on capital) but
only when they were available at bargain prices (priced to give us
a high earnings yield)? What would happen? Well, I’ll tell
you what would happen: We would make a lot of money! (Or
as Graham might put it, “The profits would be quite satisfactory!”)
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [51]

But does it make sense that something this simple and
obvious would actually work in the real world? Well, to
answer that question, a logical first step might be to go
back and see how a disciplined strategy of buying good
businesses at bargain prices would have worked in the past.
As it turns out, following a simple, commonsense investment strategy actually would have worked pretty well.
Over the last 17 years, owning a portfolio of approximately 30 stocks that had the best combination of a high
return on capital and a high earnings yield would have
returned approximately 30.8 percent per year. Investing at
that rate for 17 years, $11,000 would have turned into well
over $1 million.* Of course, for some people, that might
not seem like such a great return. On the other hand,
those people are basically nuts!
During those same 17 years, the overall market averaged a return of about 12.3 percent per year. At that rate,
$11,000 would still have turned into an impressive $79,000.
While that’s certainly a lot, $1 million is more! And you
could have made that $1 million while taking much less risk
[52] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*The special database used for our magic formula study (Compustat’s
“Point in Time” database) contains data going back a total of 17 years. It
contains the exact information known by Compustat customers at the time
of each stock purchase. At a rate of 30.8 percent per year for 17 years,
$11,000 would grow over 96× to $1,056,000 before taxes and transaction
costs.

than investing in the overall market. But we’ll talk more
about that later.
For now, let’s see just how the magic formula was put
together. In that way, we can begin to understand why such
a simple formula works and why it should continue to work
far into the future. Later, we’ll learn, in step-by-step fashion,
how to apply the magic formula to find winning investments
today. But keep in mind, the mechanics aren’t the important
part; the computer will be doing most of the work. As you
read in Chapter 1, it will be your belief in the overwhelming
logic of the magic formula that will make the formula work
for you in the long run. So let’s try to understand how the
magic formula chooses good companies at bargain prices.
The formula starts with a list of the largest 3,500
companies available for trading on one of the major U.S.
stock exchanges.* It then assigns a rank to those companies, from 1 to 3,500, based on their return on capital.
The company whose business had the highest return on
capital would be assigned a rank of 1, and the company
with the lowest return on capital (probably a company
actually losing money) would receive a rank of 3,500.
Similarly, the company that had the 232nd best return on
capital would be assigned a rank of 232.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [53]
*Details of this test are provided in the Appendix section (certain financial
stocks and utilities are excluded from our stock universe).

Next, the formula follows the same procedure, but
this time, the ranking is done using earnings yield. The
company with the highest earnings yield is assigned a rank
of 1, and the company with the lowest earnings yield
receives a rank of 3,500. Likewise, the company with the
153rd highest earnings yield out of our list of 3,500 companies would be assigned a rank of 153.
Finally, the formula just combines the rankings. The
formula isn’t looking for the company that ranks best on
return on capital or the one with the highest earnings
yield. Rather, the formula looks for the companies that have the
best combination of those two factors. So, a company that
ranked 232nd best in return on capital and 153rd highest
in earnings yield would receive a combined ranking of 385
(232 + 153). A company that ranked 1st in return on capital but only 1,150th best in earnings yield would receive
a combined ranking of 1,151 (1,150 + 1).*
If you’re not a numbers person, don’t worry. Just
keep in mind that the companies that receive the best
combined rankings are the ones that have the best combination of both factors. In this system, the company that
had the 232nd best return on capital could outrank the
company that ranked 1st in return on capital. Why?
Because we could purchase the company that had the
[54] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*The better combined ranking is, therefore, 385.

232nd best return on capital (an excellent ranking out of
3,500) for a price low enough to give us a very high earnings yield (153rd cheapest out of 3,500 based on earnings
yield). Getting excellent rankings in both categories
(though not the top-ranked in either) would be better
under this ranking system than being the top-ranked in
one category with only a pretty good ranking in the other.
Pretty simple, right? But it can’t be this easy! Can a
portfolio of 30 or so of the highest-ranked stocks really
get such great investment results? Well, consider this.
Take a look at the returns that would have been achieved
over the last 17 years if we had simply followed the recommendations of the magic formula (see Table 6.1).
Oops! This can’t be. The results are just too good!
Surely, something must be wrong here. We’ll really have
to examine these results very closely. But let’s say we leave
that for the next chapter. For now, we can review the short
summary and spend some more time enjoying the results
from using the magic formula. They appear to be quite satisfactory.
Quick Summary
1. Ben Graham had a “magic formula.” Graham figured that purchases that could meet the strict
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [55]

[56] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
TABLE 6.1 Magic Formula Results
Magic Formula Market Average* S&P 500
1988 27.1% 24.8% 16.6%
1989 44.6 18.0 31.7
1990 1.7 (16.1) (3.1)
1991 70.6 45.6 30.5
1992 32.4 11.4 7.6
1993 17.2 15.9 10.1
1994 22.0 (4.5) 1.3
1995 34.0 29.1 37.6
1996 17.3 14.9 23.0
1997 40.4 16.8 33.4
1998 25.5 (2.0) 28.6
1999 53.0 36.1 21.0
2000 7.9 (16.8) (9.1)
2001 69.6 11.5 (11.9)
2002 (4.0) (24.2) (22.1)
2003 79.9 68.8 28.7
2004 19.3 17.8 10.9
30.8% 12.3% 12.4%
*Note: The “market average” return is an equally weighted index of our
3,500-stock universe. Each stock in the index contributes equally to the
return. The S&P 500 index is a market-weighted index of 500 large stocks.
Larger stocks (those with the highest market capitalizations) are counted
more heavily than smaller stocks.

requirements of his formula were likely to be, on
average, bargains—bargains created by Mr. Market’s practically giving away businesses at unreasonably low prices.
2. Today, few companies meet the strict requirements
outlined by Graham.
3. We have designed a new magic formula—a formula
that seeks to find good companies at bargain prices.
4. The new formula appears to work. In fact, it appears to work too well.
5. Before piling every penny we have into the magic
formula, we should probably examine the results
more closely.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [57]

Chapter Seven
IT AIN’T THE THINGS WE DON’T KNOW that get us in trouble,”
said Artemus Ward, a nineteenth-century newspaper columnist. “It’s the things we know that ain’t so.” And that, in
a nutshell, is our problem. The magic formula looks like it
works. In fact, the results are so good there can hardly be
any argument. And of course, we want it to work. Who
wouldn’t want to make lots of money without trying all that
hard? But does the magic formula really work? Sure, all the
numbers look good, but do we know where they came from
(or who they’ve been with, for that matter)? More important, do we know where they’re going? Even if the formula
worked in the past, are we merely learning how to “fight the
last war”? Will the formula continue to work in the future?
“

Good questions, certainly. Before what we learned from last
chapter gets us into too much trouble, let’s see if we can
find some good answers.
First up, where did all those numbers come from?
There’s often a problem when looking back and making
assumptions about what could have been accomplished in
the past. While a computer stock-picking formula may
appear to have generated spectacular theoretical returns,
duplicating those results in the real world may be quite
difficult. For instance, the magic formula may be picking
companies that are so small that few people can really buy
them. Often, small companies have very few shares available for purchase, and even a small amount of demand for
those shares can push share prices higher. If that’s the
case, the formula may look great on paper, but in the real
world, the fantastic results can’t be replicated. That’s why
it’s important that the companies chosen by the magic formula be pretty large.
Last chapter, the magic formula ranked 3,500 of the
largest companies available for trading on the major U.S.
stock exchanges. The formula then chose its favorite
stocks from that group. Even the very smallest of those
3,500 companies still had a market value (the number of
shares times the stock price) of over $50 million.* With
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [59]
*See Appendix section for details.

companies of that size, individual investors should be able
to buy a reasonable number of shares without pushing
prices higher.
But let’s see what happens when we raise the bar a little bit. It would certainly be nice if the magic formula
worked for companies whether they were large or small.
That way we could be more confident that the basic principle of buying good companies at bargain prices works
for companies of any size. So instead of choosing from the
largest 3,500 companies, let’s look at just the largest
2,500 companies. The smallest companies in this group
have a market value of at least $200 million.
Over the last 17 years (ending in December 2004),
the magic formula worked remarkably well for this group
of larger companies, too. Owning a portfolio of 30 stocks
chosen by the magic formula would have achieved an
annual return of 23.7 percent. During the same period,
the market’s average return for this group was 12.4 percent per year. In other words, the magic formula practically doubled the market’s average annual return.
But what if we take it one step further? Let’s look back
and see what happened when we narrowed the group to
just the largest 1,000 stocks—only the companies with
market values over $1 billion. Even large institutional
investors like mutual funds and large pension funds can
buy these stocks. Well, take a look at this! (See Table 7.1.)
[60] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [61]
TABLE 7.1 Magic Formula Results (Largest 1000 Stocks)
Magic Formula Market Average* S&P 500
1988 29.4% 19.6% 16.6%
1989 30.0 27.6 31.7
1990 (6.0) (7.1) (3.1)
1991 51.5 34.4 30.5
1992 16.4 10.3 7.6
1993 0.5 14.4 10.1
1994 15.3 0.5 1.3
1995 55.9 31.4 37.6
1996 37.4 16.2 23.0
1997 41.0 19.6 33.4
1998 32.6 9.9 28.6
1999 14.4 35.1 21.0
2000 12.8 (14.5) (9.1)
2001 38.2 (9.2) (11.9)
2002 (25.3) (22.7) (22.1)
2003 50.5 41.4 28.7
2004 27.6 17.3 10.9
22.9% 11.7% 12.4%
*Note: The “market average” return is an equally weighted average of our
1,000-stock universe. The S&P 500 index is a market-weighted index of 500
large stocks.

[62] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
Once again, it appears that even the largest investors
can practically double the market’s compounded annual
return simply by following the magic formula! But this
can’t be. There must be a catch. It just looks too darn
easy! And of course, there may still be some problems.
It’s just that the problem of a magic formula that works
only on paper but not in the real world isn’t one of them.
Okay. So, the companies chosen by the magic formula
aren’t too small for investors to buy. But how about this?
Maybe the magic formula just got lucky with a few good
stock picks and that’s why the whole average looks so
good? If the magic formula doesn’t stay lucky, relying on
past results could be very dangerous. Fortunately, it’s very
unlikely that luck was much of a factor at all.
Throughout the 17 years of our study, we held a portfolio of roughly 30 stocks. Each stock selection was held
for a period of one year.* In all, over 1,500 different stock
picks were made for each of the tests (largest 3,500
stocks, largest 2,500 stocks, and largest 1,000 stocks).
When we combine all of our tests, they are the results of
over 4,500 separate magic formula selections! So it would
be very difficult to argue that luck was a major factor. But
there must be some other problem, right?
*See the Appendix section for more details.

How about this? While it’s pretty nice that the magic
formula can find 30 good companies that Mr. Market has
decided to “throw away” at bargain prices, what if it
can’t? What if those few bargain opportunities were to
disappear for some reason? What if Mr. Market simply
wised up a bit and stopped offering us those few incredible bargains? If that happened, we really would be out of
luck. So let’s try a little experiment.
Starting with the largest 2,500 companies, what if we
ranked them again using the magic formula? In other
words, what if we ranked them from 1 to 2,500, from best
to worst? Remember, the formula is looking for companies that have the best combination of a high return on
capital and a high earnings yield. So the companies that
appeared to be in good businesses and available at bargain
prices would be ranked closer to number 1, while the companies losing lots of money that were offered at expensive
prices would be ranked closer to 2,500.
Now what if we divided those 2,500 companies into
10 equal groups based on their rankings? In other words,
Group 1 would contain the 250 companies that the magic
formula viewed as good companies at bargain prices,
Group 2 would be the second-highest-ranked group of
250 companies, Group 3 would be the third-highestranked group, and so on. Group 10, therefore, would be
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [63]

a group of 250 stocks that the magic formula ranked as
being poor companies at expensive prices.
So what would happen if we did this every month for
17 years? What if we held each of those stock portfolios
(each containing roughly 250 stocks) for one year and calculated the returns? Well, take a look (see Table 7.2).
Gee, that’s interesting. The magic formula doesn’t just
work for only 30 stocks. The magic formula appears to work
in order. The best-ranked stocks perform the best and as the
ranking drops, so do the returns! Group 1 beats Group 2,
Group 2 beats Group 3, Group 3 beats Group 4, and so on,
straight down the line from Group 1 to Group 10. Group 1,
our best-ranked stocks, beats Group 10, our worst-ranked
stocks, by over 15 percent a year. That’s pretty amazing!
[64] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
TABLE 7.2 Annualized Return (1988–2004)
Group 1 17.9%
Group 2 15.6
Group 3 14.8
Group 4 14.2
Group 5 14.1
Group 6 12.7
Group 7 11.3
Group 8 10.1
Group 9 5.2
Group 10 2.5

In fact, it appears as though the magic formula can
predict the future! If we know how a group of companies
is ranked by the magic formula, we have a pretty good
idea of how well that group will perform on average as an
investment in the future. That also means that if we can’t,
for some reason, buy the top 30 stocks as ranked by the
magic formula, it’s no big deal. Buying the next 30 should
work pretty well also. So should the next 30! In fact, the
whole group of top-ranked stocks appears to do well.
That may also solve one of our other potential problems. Remember how Ben Graham had his own “magic
formula”? Buying a group of stocks that could meet the
strict requirements of Graham’s formula was a great way
to make money. Unfortunately, in today’s market, few, if
any, companies qualify for purchase under Graham’s original formula. That means Graham’s formula isn’t as useful as it once was. Fortunately, our magic formula doesn’t
seem to have that problem. It is merely a ranking formula.
By definition, there always have to be stocks that rank at
the top. Not only that, because the formula appears to
work in order, we’re not limited to just the top 30 stocks.
Since the entire group of top-ranked stocks does well,
there should always be plenty of high-performing stocks to
choose from!
For those of you keeping score on the sidelines, it’s
looking pretty good for the magic formula. Come on.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [65]

That “ranking stocks in order” thing—man, that’s pretty
scary. It’s been nice arguing back and forth about whether
the magic formula really works, but the winner of that battle is pretty obvious. Maybe we should just stop the fight
right now before somebody gets hurt?
Alas. Not so fast. Sure, the evidence is pretty convincing. But all that means is that the magic formula has
worked in the past. How do we know the magic formula
will continue to work in the future? After all, with me
being such a blabbermouth, why won’t everyone start
using it? Won’t that ruin everything?
Well, after we look at the summary, let’s see . . .
1. The magic formula works for companies both large
and small.
2. The magic formula was extensively tested. The
great returns do not appear to be a matter of luck.
3. The magic formula ranks stocks in order. As a
result, there should always be plenty of highly
ranked stocks to choose from. The magic formula
has been an incredibly accurate indicator of how a
group of stocks will perform in the future!
4. Next chapter, we’ll have to discuss whether the
magic formula can continue to get such great
results. (That would be nice!)
[66] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Chapter Eight
I ADMIT IT. My knowledge of history is a little fuzzy.* I
guess I should have listened better in class. But there’s
one part of our history that has always baffled me. I never
really understood how we won the Revolutionary War.
Here we were, these 13 little colonies, up against the
strongest country in the world. England had the best navy,
the mightiest army, the most money, and yet our scrappy
little ragtag group of soldiers pulled out a victory! How’d
that happen? Well, I have a theory. Given my limited
knowledge, I don’t know whether my theory has been
*Though my knowledge of Bob Newhart’s old comedy routines is quite
good.

extensively studied. But the way I see it, we won because
we were fighting a bunch of complete idiots!
After all, the British strategy left a lot to be desired.
On one side, you had British soldiers standing in plain
sight, perfectly lined up, wearing, of all things, bright red
coats, while shooting in unison! I’m sure it looked quite
nice. On the other side, you had our guys, a messy, disorganized hodgepodge of soldiers, hiding behind rocks and
trees, shooting back at a bunch of conveniently arranged
bright red targets! No wonder we won!
But here’s the part I don’t get. I can’t imagine this
was the first time the British fought like that. In other
words, despite what I think, the British way of fighting
must have actually worked in the past. My only question
is—how? For all I know, they’d been doing it that way for
hundreds of years and apparently—whether it makes sense
to me or not—with a great deal of success. Yet following
the same game plan that had worked so well in the past
clearly wasn’t a good strategy going forward. The British
found that out the hard way.
So what about us? We’re about to march off, armed
with what looks like a great game plan. We have a magic
formula that makes sense and has produced phenomenal
results in the past. We expect to have a lot of success with
it in the future. But before we all line up to collect our
money, we better stop and think about one obvious
[68] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

problem: How can our strategy keep working after everyone knows about it? If we can’t find a good answer, like
the British, we may end up as just another easy target.
Well, first, here’s some really good news. As it turns
out, there are plenty of times when the magic formula
doesn’t work at all! Isn’t that great? In fact, on average,
in five months out of each year, the magic formula portfolio does worse than the overall market. But forget months.
Often, the magic formula doesn’t work for a full year or
even more. That’s even better!
Imagine buying a book that tells you to invest real
money in a group of stocks whose names were spit out by
a computer. Imagine diligently watching those stocks each
day as they do worse than the market averages over the
course of many months or even years. Now imagine
deciding enough is enough. No more trusting that stupid
book or that mindless computer. You’re going to roll up
your sleeves and investigate the companies you purchased
and the outlook for the businesses you actually own. As
we’ll find out later, imagine the horror when you realize
that if you had only investigated these companies for a few
minutes before buying your shares, there is no way you
would have touched many of them. Finally, despite awful
performance and the disagreeable prospects of the stocks
that you own, imagine vowing to continue following the
advice of that stupid book and that mindless computer!
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [69]

But why even worry about all this? After all, the
magic formula works. We proved it last chapter! We’re
going to do really well, so there’s no need to worry about
months or years of poor performance. And though that
sounds right, unfortunately, looking at the statistics for
only our very successful 17-year test period, it turns out
there’s actually plenty to worry about.
The magic formula portfolio fared poorly relative to
the market averages in 5 out of every 12 months tested.
For full-year periods, the magic formula failed to beat the
market averages once every four years.* For one out of
every six periods tested, the magic formula did poorly for
more than two years in a row. During those wonderful 17
years for the magic formula, there were even some periods
when the formula did worse than the overall market for
three years in a row!
Think it’s easy to stick with a formula that hasn’t
worked for several years? Do you think the typical reaction goes something like “I know this hasn’t worked for
a long time,” or “I know I just lost a lot of money,” but
“Let’s keep doing what we’re doing!”? I assure you, it
is not.
[70] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Annual returns were calculated from January 1988 to January 1989, February 1988 to February 1989, and so on, through the end of 2004. In all,
193 separate one-year periods were examined.

Take, for example, the case of the author with the
best-selling investment book. For his book, the author
tested dozens of stock-picking formulas over a period of
many decades to determine which of those strategies had
beaten the market over the long run. The book was excellent and well-reasoned. The author then opened a mutual
fund based on buying only those stocks picked by the most
successful formula of the dozens he had tested.
The fund then proceeded to perform worse than the
major market averages for two of its first three years. For
one of those years, the fund underperformed the market
average by 25 percent! After three years, the fund was
performing poorly relative to competing funds and the
best-selling author—the guy who did the tests, the guy
who wrote the book—decided to sell his fund management
company to somebody else! In fairness, I don’t think the
author gave up on his formula, but clearly he saw better
opportunities elsewhere! Had he known that that same
fund, the one managed strictly according to his formula,
would come back over the next three years to be one of
the top-performing mutual funds since the time of its
inception (even including the tough first few years), perhaps he would have stuck with it longer!
But that’s not unusual. The unpredictability of Mr.
Market’s moods and the pressures of competing with
other money managers can make it really hard to stick
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [71]

with a strategy that hasn’t worked for years. That goes for
any strategy, no matter how sensible and regardless of
how good the long-term track record is. Let’s take a look
at the experience of a good friend of mine who happens to
be the “smartest money manager I know.” Though he
doesn’t automatically buy stocks that his computer-based
formula spits out, he does follow a disciplined strategy of
choosing companies to buy only from the list of companies his formula ranks the highest.
He used this strategy very successfully for 10 years at
his previous investment firm, and nine years ago he set out
to form his own money management firm using the same
basic principles. Business wasn’t too good for the first
three or four years, as the same strategy that had been so
successful in the past drastically underperformed the returns of competing money management firms and the major market averages. Nevertheless, the “smartest money
manager I know” strongly believed that his strategy still
made tremendous sense in the long run and that he should
continue following the same course as always. Unfortunately, his clients disagreed. The vast majority of them
ran for the exits, pulling their money away in large numbers, most likely to give it to a manager who, unlike my
friend, “knew what he was doing.”
As you guessed, they should have stuck around. The
last five or six years have been so good for my friend and
[72] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

his strategy that now the investment record of his firm
since its inception (once again, including those tough first
few years) has trounced the returns of the major market
averages over the comparable time frame. Today it stands
among the top of only a small handful of firms with
extraordinary investment records out of the thousands of
investment firms on Wall Street. To prove that sometimes
good things do come to those who wait, my friend’s firm
now manages over $10 billion for hundreds of clients. Too
bad that, in the face of several years of underperformance,
most choose not to wait. Only four original clients
remain.*
So what’s the point? The point is that if the magic
formula worked all the time, everyone would probably use
it. If everyone used it, it would probably stop working. So
many people would be buying the shares of the bargainpriced stocks selected by the magic formula that the
prices of those shares would be pushed higher almost
immediately. In other words, if everyone used the formula, the bargains would disappear and the magic formula would be ruined!
That’s why we’re so lucky the magic formula isn’t
that great. It doesn’t work all the time. In fact, it might
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [73]
*Luckily, I’m one of them! (Though, as his friend, I probably had to stick
around.)

not work for years. Most people just won’t wait that long.
Their investment time horizon is too short. If a strategy
works in the long run (meaning it sometimes takes three,
four, or even five years to show its stuff), most people
won’t stick with it. After a year or two of performing
worse than the market averages (or earning lower returns
than their friends), most people look for a new strategy—
usually one that has done well over the past few years.
Even professional money managers who believe their
strategy will work over the long term have a hard time
sticking with it. After a few years of poor performance
relative to the market or to their competitors, the vast
majority of clients and investors just leave! That’s why it’s
hard to stay with a strategy that doesn’t follow along with
everyone else’s. As a professional manager, if you do
poorly while everyone else is doing well, you run the risk
of losing all your clients and possibly your job!
Many managers feel the only way to avoid that risk is
to invest pretty much the way everyone else does. Often
this means owning the most popular companies, usually
the ones whose prospects look most promising over the
next few quarters or the next year or two.
Perhaps now you’re beginning to see why most
everyone else won’t be using the magic formula. Though
some may take it out for a spin, most won’t last past the
first few months or years of poor performance. As we
[74] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

discussed back in Chapter 1, you’re also beginning to
see why all that having to believe stuff is so important. If
you don’t believe that the magic formula will work for
you, you’ll most likely quit before it has a chance to
work! At least, that’s where the statistics over the last
17 years seem to point. The magic formula works—
long-term annual returns of double, or in some cases
almost triple, the returns of the market averages—only
those good returns can get pretty lumpy. Over shorter
periods, it may work or it may not. When it comes to the
magic formula, “shorter” periods can often mean years,
not days or months. In a strange but logical way, that’s
the good news.
Good news, that is, if you believe enough in the magic
formula to stick with it over the long term. But to truly
stick with a strategy that hasn’t worked in years and years,
you’re going to have to really believe in it deep down in
your bones. Sure, the spectacular track record of the
magic formula will help, but let’s see what your bones
think of the next chapter.
Quick Summary
1. The magic formula appears to work very well over
the long term.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [75]

2. The magic formula often doesn’t work for several
years in a row.
3. Most investors won’t (or can’t) stick with a strategy
that hasn’t worked for several years in a row.
4. For the magic formula to work for you, you must
believe that it will work and maintain a long-term
investment horizon.
5. If it wasn’t for this chapter, the next chapter would
be the most important chapter in the book.
[76] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Chapter Nine
VOMIT UNDER THE 3EM-SPACES AND RUN!”
Now there’s a saying you don’t hear every day. The
main reason you don’t hear it much is pretty straightforward. Over time, the phrase has lost all of its meaning. In
fact, I really only needed it to pass my eighth-grade course
in print shop.
You see, old-time printers used to set type by hand
and actually picked letters individually out of a box. To
pass the course, my fellow middle schoolers and I were
forced to memorize the location of these letters. The letters in the bottom row were V-U-T, then something called
a 3em-space, followed by the letters A-R. We remembered
“

the order by the catchy phrase “Vomit under the 3emspaces and run!”
With the advent of computers, my little memory
device—and print shop, for that matter—is now useless.
Of course, the world has changed a lot since I was in middle school. No one teaches print shop anymore. Thankfully, though, some subjects haven’t changed. Math class,
for one, is still pretty much the same. As investors, that’s
really important to know.
That’s because, in order for the magic formula to
make us money in the long run, the principles behind it
must appear not only sensible and logical, but timeless.
Otherwise, there is no way we’ll be able to “hang on”
when our short-term results turn against us. As simple as
it may seem, knowing that two plus two always equals four
can be a pretty powerful concept. No matter how many
people tell us differently, no matter how long they tell us,
and no matter how smart all those people appear to be, we
are unlikely to waver in our conviction. In a similar way,
our level of confidence in the magic formula will determine whether we can hang on to a strategy that may be
both unpopular and unsuccessful for seemingly long periods of time.
So what is it about the magic formula that makes
sense—so much sense, in fact, that we won’t waver when
things turn against us? Well, let’s take another look.
[78] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

The magic formula chooses companies through a
ranking system. Those companies that have both a high
return on capital and a high earnings yield are the ones
that the formula ranks as best. Put more simply, the formula is systematically helping us find above-average companies that we can buy at below-average prices.
That certainly sounds logical and sensible. If, indeed,
that’s what we’re really doing, it also sounds like a strategy we can truly believe in. So, let’s go step-by-step and
see whether that’s true.
First, why are companies that earn a high return on
capital so special? What kind of companies is our formula
telling us to buy? What makes them above average? To
understand the answers to those questions, let’s go back
and check in with our old friend Jason.
Last year, as you may remember, was a pretty good
year for Jason’s business. Each of his gum shops earned
$200,000. Since he only had to invest $400,000 to build
each store (including inventory, store displays, etc.), that
meant that his return on capital for opening a gum shop
was a pretty impressive 50 percent ($200,000 divided by
$400,000). So what does that mean?
Most people and most businesses can’t find an investment
that will earn a 50 percent annual return. If the past year is a
good guideline and Jason’s company can really earn 50
percent a year on its money by simply opening another
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [79]

store, that makes Jason’s Gum Shops a pretty special
business. Think about that. Having the opportunity to
invest your money and earn 50 percent per year is pretty
rare. While it’s true that there is no guarantee that
Jason’s new stores (or his old stores) will continue to earn
50 percent returns each year on their original cost, last
year’s high returns may be a good indicator of the opportunity to earn high returns from investing in that same
business going forward.
If that’s true and Jason’s Gum Shops can continue
to earn high returns from its investments in old and new
stores, that’s really good news for Jason. First, that may
mean that the profits from Jason’s business don’t have to
just sit there. While Jason’s Gum Shops could take
those earnings and invest in a government bond paying 6
percent per year, they have a much better option. The
company can take those earnings and invest them in a
new store. So not only will the original investment in the
first store continue to earn 50 percent per year, but
Jason’s Gum Shops has the chance to invest the profits
from the first store in a new store that may also earn 50
percent a year!
This opportunity to invest profits at high rates of return is
very valuable. For example, if Jason’s Gum Shops earned
$200,000 last year, Jason has a few options. He can distribute that money to the shareholders of the business (the
[80] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

shareholders can then invest that money however they
choose). If the business doesn’t change much this coming
year, Jason’s Gum Shops will earn $200,000 again. That
may be a fine outcome.
But if, instead, Jason’s Gum Shops takes its $200,000
in profits and invests them in government bonds paying 6
percent (3.6 percent after taxes at a 40 percent rate), Jason’s
business will earn $207,200 this coming year ($200,000
from the store and $7,200 in after-tax profits from interest
on the bond). Though earnings would be higher than last
year, the growth rate in earnings would not be very high.
But here’s where the big bucks roll in. If Jason takes
that same $200,000 in profits and can invest it in a new
store that earns a 50 percent annual return,* the earnings
for Jason’s Gum Shops will grow to $300,000 in the coming year ($200,000 from the original store and an additional $100,000 from the investment in the new store).
Going from $200,000 in earnings last year to $300,000 in
the coming year would represent a 50 percent earnings
growth rate in one year!
In other words, owning a business that has the opportunity
to invest some or all of its profits at a very high rate of return can
contribute to a very high rate of earnings growth!
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [81]
*Assume for this example that we can invest in half a store (though a new
store costs $400,000).

So now we know two important things about businesses that can earn a high return on capital. First, businesses that can earn a high return on capital may also have
the opportunity to invest their profits at very high rates of
return. Since most people and businesses can invest their
money at only average rates of return, this opportunity is
something special. Second, as we just learned, the ability
to earn a high return on capital may also contribute to a
high rate of earnings growth. Certainly, that’s good news
for the companies chosen by the magic formula.
But that still leaves us with one obvious question. If a
business like Jason’s really can make 50 percent a year by
opening a gum shop, why won’t other people see that and
start opening their own gum shops?
That would mean more competition for Jason’s Gum
Shops. More competition could mean that Jason will sell
less gum in each of his stores. More competition could
mean that Jason must lower his prices to attract business.
More competition could mean that someone builds a better gum shop. In short, more competition could mean
lower profits going forward for Jason’s Gum Shops.
In fact, that’s how our system of capitalism works.
Good businesses attract competition. Even if competing
gum shops open up and the return on capital from opening a new Jason’s gum store drops to 40 percent, the
threat to future profits might not end there. Earning 40
[82] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

percent annual returns from opening a gum shop is still
quite good. People might see those 40 percent annual
returns from opening a gum shop as very attractive and
decide to open their own gum shops. Then, due to the
increased competition, returns may fall all the way to 30
percent per year from building a new gum shop.
But even there it might not stop! Earning 30 percent
a year on an investment is also good. More competition
could continue to drive down future returns on capital
from new stores and from old stores that are already built.
This whole capitalism thing could result in profits continuing to spiral downward until the annual returns on capital from owning gum stores isn’t so great anymore. Some
system!
But here’s the thing. If capitalism is such a tough system, how does the magic formula find us companies that
are able to earn a high return on capital in the first place?
To earn a high return on capital even for one year, it’s
likely that, at least temporarily, there’s something special
about that company’s business. Otherwise, competition
would already have driven down returns on capital to
lower levels.
It could be that the company has a relatively new
business concept (perhaps a candy store that sells only
gum), or a new product (like a hot video game), or a better product (such as an iPod that’s smaller and easier to
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [83]

use than competitors’ products), a good brand name
(people will happily pay more for Coke than for Joe’s
Cola, so Coke can charge more than Joe’s and continue
to earn a high return on capital despite having competition), or a company could have a very strong competitive
position (eBay was one of the first auction web sites and
has more buyers and sellers than anyone else, so it’s
hard for new auction sites to offer the same benefits to
customers).
In short, companies that achieve a high return on capital
are likely to have a special advantage of some kind. That special advantage keeps competitors from destroying the ability to
earn above-average profits.
Businesses that don’t have anything special going for
them (such as new or better products, well-known brand
names, or strong competitive positions) are likely to earn
only average or below-average returns on capital. If there’s
nothing special about a company’s business, then it’s
easy for someone to come in and start a competing business. If a business is earning a high return on capital and
it’s easy to compete, eventually someone will! They’ll
keep competing until returns on capital are driven down
to average levels.
But the magic formula doesn’t choose companies with
average returns on capital. It doesn’t choose companies
[84] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

with below-average returns on capital, either. (Businesses
like Just Broccoli are unlikely to earn a high return on
capital for even one year!)
So by eliminating companies that earn ordinary or poor
returns on capital, the magic formula starts with a group of companies that have a high return on capital.
Sure, some of the companies chosen by the magic formula won’t be able to maintain their high return on capital.
As we just learned, businesses with high returns on capital
tend to attract competition. Also, even mediocre businesses can have a good year or two and temporarily achieve
a high return on capital.
But, on average, the high-return-on-capital companies
chosen by the magic formula are more likely to have the
opportunity to reinvest a portion of their profits at high
rates of return. They are more likely to have the ability to
achieve high rates of earnings growth. They are also more
likely to have some special competitive advantage that will
allow them to continue to earn an above-average return on
capital. In other words, on average, the magic formula is finding us good companies!
And what does the magic formula do with this group
of good companies ...?
It tries to buy them at bargain prices!
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [85]

The formula chooses only good companies that also
have a high earnings yield. A high earnings yield means
that the formula will buy only those companies that earn a
lot compared to the price we are paying.
Hmmm . . . buying above-average companies at below
average prices, it sounds like it should work!
But how do your bones feel about that?
Quick Summary
1. Most people and businesses can’t find investments
that will earn very high rates of return. A company
that can earn a high return on capital is therefore
very special.
2. Companies that earn a high return on capital may
also have the opportunity to invest some or all of
their profits at a high rate of return. This opportunity is very valuable. It can contribute to a high rate
of earnings growth.
3. Companies that achieve a high return on capital are
likely to have a special advantage of some kind.
That special advantage keeps competitors from
destroying the ability to earn above-average profits.
4. By eliminating companies that earn ordinary or
poor returns on capital, the magic formula starts
[86] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

with a group of companies that have a high return
on capital. It then tries to buy these above-average
companies at below-average prices.
5. Since the magic formula makes overwhelming
sense, we should be able to stick with it during
good times and bad.
And finally,
6. If you must vomit under the 3em-spaces, don’t forget to run!
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [87]

Chapter Ten
I LOVE SAILING.
I’m not very good at sailing.
I know this, not just from the fact that my wife and
kids are scared to go with me, but from hard experience. Once, through a slight miscalculation of wind and
water speed, I was 20 feet away from being slammed by
a barge at least three football fields long. I remember
this quite well, because I had my wife as a passenger
(who hates boats anyway) while I was busy pulling the
starter cord on my little five-horsepower outboard
engine (darn thing never works when you really need it)
as the giant barge blasted its horn for me to get out of
the way.

Usually sailboats have the right of way over motorboats, but since 9-billion-pound barges don’t steer all that
quickly, the right-of-way thing gets switched around (good
to keep in mind if it ever comes up). So there I was,
repeatedly pulling the worthless starter cord while trying
to act like I had everything under control (just so my
wife’s last words wouldn’t be “I hate this stupid boat!”),
when a final puff of wind helped us sail out of danger.
I’m recounting this story not because I enjoy sailing
alone. I actually like having company (preferably brave or
blind company). I’m telling you this because even though
I’m clearly not a good sailor, I still love sailing. And that’s
the same way many people feel about investing in the stock
market. They may not be particularly good at it, or they may
not know whether they are any good at it, but there’s something about the process or the experience that they enjoy.
For some of these people, investing by using a magic
formula may take away some of that fun. I understand
this. There are also people who are good or would be
good at picking individual stocks—without using a magic
formula. And that’s fine, too. The next chapter should
give both groups an idea of what they’ll need to know if
they want to be successful at picking stocks on their own.
It should also show them how the principles behind the
magic formula can still be used to guide individual investment decisions. But before even thinking about whether
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [89]

to go forward investing with or without the magic formula, there are still a few more things you should know.
First, the magic formula has a better track record
than I’ve been letting on. I didn’t reveal this good news
earlier for a reason. A good track record is not why you
should want to follow the magic formula. A good track
record is not why you will have good results in the future.
A good track record is not why you will keep following the
magic formula even when results turn against you. The
truth is that a good track record only helps once you
understand why the track record is so good. Now that you
do—simply put, the magic formula makes perfect sense—I can
trust you not to get carried away with a little more good
news.
As you recall, the magic formula was tested over a
recent 17-year period. A portfolio of approximately 30
stocks selected by the magic formula was held throughout
that time, with each individual stock selection held for a
period of one year. Performance was then measured over
193 separate one-year periods.* The stock portfolios
[90] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Performance was measured from January 1988 to January 1989, then February 1988 to February 1989, then March 1988 to March 1989, and so on,
for 193 one-year periods ending December 31, 2004. This is commonly
referred to as 193 rolling one-year periods. Measuring three-year rolling
periods would mean measuring performance from January 1988 to January
1991, February 1988 to February 1991, and so on.

chosen by the magic formula usually beat the market averages, but there were one-, two-, and even three-year-long
periods when this was not the case. This created the risk
that investors might give up on the formula before it had
a chance to work its magic.
As we discussed, over one-year periods, the magic
formula stock portfolios underperformed the market averages in one out of every four years tested. Following the
formula for any two-year period in a row (starting with any
month during the 17 years), the magic formula underperformed the market averages in one out of every six periods tested. Remember, while that may not sound all that
bad, underperforming for two years in a row is actually
pretty hard to take! But here comes the good news. Following the formula for any three-year period in a row, the
magic formula beat the market averages 95 percent of the
time (160 out of 169 three-year periods tested)!*
But that’s not all! Over three-year periods, if you followed the magic formula, you would never have lost
money. That’s right. Sticking with the magic formula for
any three-year period during those 17 years, you would
have made money 100 percent of the time (169 out of 169
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [91]
*There are fewer three-year periods tested than one-year periods because
the last three-year period that could be tested started in January 2002 and
ended December 31, 2004. The last one-year period started in January
2004.

three-year periods).* Of the 169 separate three-year periods tested, the worst return for the magic formula was a
gain of 11 percent. The worst return over a three-year
period for the market averages was a loss of 46 percent.
That’s a pretty big difference!
But that’s still not all. All those numbers you just read
about were based on the results achieved by choosing
from only the largest 1,000 stocks (those with a market
value over $1 billion). The results from choosing from the
largest 3,500 stocks (market values over $50 million), a
group of stocks individual investors can generally buy,
were even better. Every three-year period tested (169 of
169) was positive for the magic formula portfolios, and
every three-year period beat the market averages (169 out
of 169). That’s right. The magic formula beat the market
averages in every single period! Hey, maybe there is something to this magic formula, after all!†
But can we really expect such great results without
taking much risk? Well, the answer often depends on how
you choose to look at risk.‡ Although over the last 50
[92] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*In other words, during our 17-year test period, the magic formula portfolios were still profitable even when they didn’t beat the market.
†
With this group of 3,500 companies, the worst three-year return for the
magic formula portfolios was a gain of 35 percent. For the market averages,
the worst three-year return was a loss of 45 percent!
‡
Though, in this case, the magic formula looks pretty darn good no matter
how we choose to measure risk.

years professors in the financial field have come up with
interesting ways to measure or compare the risks of different investment strategies, most of these involve measuring risk in a way that should have no meaning to you.
This is true especially if you choose to invest with a truly
long-term time horizon. When thinking about risk, rather
than making things unnecessarily complicated, there are
really two main things you should want to know about an
investment strategy:
1. What is the risk of losing money following that strategy
over the long term?
2. What is the risk that your chosen strategy will perform
worse than alternative strategies over the long term?
So how does the magic formula stack up under this
definition of risk? Since it is fairly easy to design an investment strategy to equal the return of the market averages*
(and yet, as we’ll discuss later, most professional investors
do even worse than the market averages), we can, at the
very least, make a reasonable comparison of these two
simple strategies. So let’s see.
During our test period and using even a relatively
short three-year time frame, the magic formula strategy
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [93]
*Such as an investment in an index fund or an exchange-traded fund (ETF).

did pretty darn well. The returns from the magic formula
strategy were far superior to the returns of the market
averages. The magic formula strategy never lost money.*
The magic formula strategy beat the market averages over
almost every single three-year period tested. In short, the
magic formula strategy achieved better results with less risk
than the market averages.
Though sticking with the magic formula strategy for
even three years paid off incredibly well during our test
period, this may not always be the case. Even superior
investment strategies may take a long time to show their
stuff. If an investment strategy truly makes sense, the
longer the time horizon you maintain, the better your
chances for ultimate success. Time horizons of 5, 10, or
even 20 years are ideal.
Though not easy to do, even maintaining a three- to
five-year horizon for your stock market investments should
give you a large advantage over most investors. It is also
the minimum time frame for any meaningful comparison of
the risks and results of alternative investment strategies.
We now have a better understanding of just how powerful and low risk the magic formula truly is, but we still
[94] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*The market averages lost money in 12 percent of the three-year periods
tested. Of course, despite the 100 percent success rate of the magic formula
during the test period, it is almost certain that the magic formula strategy will
have negative performance periods in the future.

have one problem left to solve before we can move on to
the next chapter. It has to do with our old friend Mr. Market, and maintaining a proper time horizon plays a key
role here, too.
As you may recall from the first day of business
school in Chapter 4, it is Mr. Market’s constantly changing emotional state that creates the bargain opportunities
that the magic formula is able to put to its advantage. But
these same emotions create a problem. If Mr. Market is
so unstable, how can we be sure that he will eventually pay
a fair price for our bargain purchases? If we don’t eventually get a fair price from Mr. Market, a bargain could
remain a bargain forever (or worse, become even more of
a bargain!).
So here’s the other thing you need to know about Mr.
Market:
• Over the short term, Mr. Market acts like a wildly
emotional guy who can buy or sell stocks at depressed
or inflated prices.
• Over the long run, it’s a completely different story:
Mr. Market gets it right.
Yep. Over the long term, crazy Mr. Market is actually
a very rational fellow. It may take a few weeks or a few
months, and not infrequently a few years, but eventually
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [95]

Mr. Market will pay a fair price for our shares. I actually
give a guarantee to my MBA students at the beginning of
each semester. I guarantee them that if they do a good job
valuing a company, Mr. Market will eventually agree with
them. I tell them that, though it can occasionally take
longer, if their analysis is correct, two to three years is
usually all the time they’ll have to wait for Mr. Market to
reward their bargain purchases with a fair price.
How can this be? Isn’t Mr. Market an emotional basket case? Well, although it’s true that Mr. Market can
often be ruled by emotion over the short term, over time
facts and reality take over. If the price of a stock has been
beaten down unfairly in the short term by an overly emotional Mr. Market (this could happen, for instance, when
a company announces some bad news or is expected to
receive some bad news in the near future), a few things
can take place.
First, there are a lot of smart people out there. If the
price offered by Mr. Market is truly a bargain, some of
these smart people will eventually recognize the bargain
opportunity, buy stock, and push the price closer to fair
value. This doesn’t have to happen right away. Sometimes
uncertainty about the prospects for a particular company
over the near term will keep potential buyers away. Sometimes the influence of emotions can last for years. But
here’s the thing. Eventually, the problem or the reason for
[96] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

the emotional reaction is resolved. It could be a positive
resolution or a negative one. It doesn’t really matter. If
there is uncertainty about a company’s earnings over the
next two or three years, by waiting long enough we eventually find out the answer (even if this takes the full two or
three years!). Once the reality of the situation is known,
smart investors will buy stock if the bargain opportunity
still exists.
Second, even if these so-called “smart” people don’t
recognize the bargain opportunity and buy shares, there
are other ways that stock prices can move toward fair
value. Often companies buy back their own shares. If a
company believes its shares are undervalued, the management of the company can decide that it is a good investment to use its own cash and repurchase some of the
company’s shares.* So this action of companies buying
back their own shares is another activity that causes prices
to rise and may help eliminate some bargain opportunities.
If that doesn’t work, there are still other ways that
share prices tend to move toward fair value. Remember, a
share of stock represents an ownership interest in an
actual company. Anyone who buys all of the shares
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [97]
*This would reduce the amount of cash the company had, but it would also
reduce the number of shares outstanding of the company. If ownership of
the company is distributed among fewer shares, each remaining shareholder
would own a larger percentage interest in the company.

outstanding would then own the entire company. Often, if
a bargain opportunity persists for too long, another company or a large investment firm may decide to make a bid
for all of the shares outstanding and purchase the entire
company. Sometimes even the possibility that a buyer for
the whole company may emerge can cause share prices to
rise toward fair value.
In short, over time the interaction of all of these
things—smart investors searching for bargain opportunities, companies buying back their own shares, and the
takeover or possibility of a takeover of an entire company—work together to move share prices toward fair
value. Sometimes this process works quickly, and sometimes it can take several years.
Although over the short term, Mr. Market may set stock
prices based on emotion, over the long term, it is the value of the
company that becomes most important to Mr. Market.
This means that if you buy shares at what you believe to be
a bargain price and you are right, Mr. Market will eventually
agree and offer to buy those shares at a fair price. In other
words, bargain purchases will be rewarded. Though the process
doesn’t always work quickly, two to three years is usually enough
time for Mr. Market to get things right.
So now that we have all that good news out of the way,
let’s see if we can sail through the next chapter without
hitting anything.
[98] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Quick Summary
1. The magic formula works. It works even better
than I let on before.
2. The magic formula achieved its far superior results
with far less risk than the market averages.
3. Although over the short term Mr. Market may
price stocks based on emotion, over the long term
Mr. Market prices stocks based on their value.
4. If you couldn’t vomit under the 3em-spaces, try
sailing with me.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [99]

Chapter Eleven
SO THE MAGIC FORMULA ISN’T YOUR THING. The high returns,
the low risk, the simplicity, the logic—these things mean
nothing to you. You want—in fact, you need—to pick stocks
all by yourself! No one, and especially no silly formula, is
going to stand in your way. You’re out there on the ledge,
and there’s no use talking you down! Don’t worry. I get it,
and that’s just fine. But to borrow from something I once
wrote, remember this:
Choosing individual stocks without any idea of what you’re
looking for is like running through a dynamite factory with a
burning match. You may live, but you’re still an idiot.

So how can you pick stocks intelligently? What should
you be looking for? Even if you’ve decided not to follow
the magic formula, how can you still use it to keep from
blowing yourself up? Well, glad you asked. Let’s see.
As we already know, the magic formula picks stocks that
have both a high earnings yield and a high return on capital.
For earnings yield, the formula looks for companies that
earn a lot compared to the price we have to pay. For return
on capital, the formula looks for companies that earn a lot
compared to how much the company has to pay to buy the
assets that created those earnings. To calculate these ratios,
the magic formula doesn’t look at future earnings. That’s
too hard. The magic formula uses last year’s earnings.
The funny thing is, that seems like the wrong thing to
do. The value of a company comes from how much money
it will earn for us in the future, not from what happened
in the past. If a company earned $2 per share last year,
but will earn only $1 per share this year and even less in
the future, using last year’s earnings to calculate earnings
yield and return on capital will be very misleading. But
that’s precisely what the magic formula does!
In fact, often the near-term prospects for the companies selected by the magic formula don’t look so good. In
many cases, the outlook for the next year or two is downright ugly. But that’s one reason the magic formula can
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [101]

find companies whose prices seem like bargains. The
magic formula uses last year’s earnings. If, instead, estimates for this year’s or next year’s earnings were used,
many of the companies selected by the magic formula
might not look like such bargains at all!
So what should we be doing? Ideally, better than blindly
plugging in last year’s earnings to the formula, we should be
plugging in estimates for earnings in a normal year.* Of
course, last year’s earnings could be representative of a normal year, but last year may not have been typical for a number of reasons. Earnings could have been higher than
normal due to extraordinarily favorable conditions that may
not be repeated in most years. Alternatively, there may have
been a temporary problem with the company’s operations,
and earnings may have been lower than in a normal year.
Plugging in estimates for next year’s earnings to our formula may suffer from the same problem. Next year may not
be typical. So one solution might be to look ahead even further to our estimates of what earnings will be three or four
years from now in a normal or average environment. Shortterm issues that may have affected last year’s earnings or
that may affect earnings over the next year or two could
then largely be eliminated from our thinking.
[102] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*A normal year is one in which nothing extraordinary or unusual is happening within the company, its industry, or the overall economy.

In this ideal world, we would then be able to take our
estimates of normal earnings and calculate earnings yield
and return on capital. Using the principles of the magic
formula, we could look for companies that had both a
high earnings yield and a high return on capital based on
normal earnings. Of course, we would also need to assess
how confident we were in our estimates and make a judgment on whether those earnings were likely to grow in the
future.* We could then compare the earnings yield based
on normal earnings to a risk-free 6 percent government
bond and to our other investment opportunities.
Does that sound hard to do? Well, it is. Yet it’s not
impossible. There are people who can do this type of
analysis. In fact, this is precisely the way my partners and
I use the principles behind the magic formula to make our
own investment decisions. But if you can’t do this type of
analysis (and here comes the main point of this chapter):
You have no business investing in
individual stocks on your own!
That’s right. Forget about it!
But wait a second. The magic formula does pretty
well, and it just uses last year’s earnings. It doesn’t make
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [103]
*As well as whether there was an honest management team that would reinvest those profits wisely.

any estimates, and it doesn’t even do any thinking. How
come the magic formula gets to pick stocks and I’m
telling most of you to just forget about picking individual
stocks on your own?
Well, the answer is that the magic formula doesn’t
pick individual stocks, either. It picks many stocks at one
time. Looking at a whole portfolio of stocks, it turns out
that using last year’s earnings is often a good indicator of
what earnings will look like in the future. Of course, for
individual companies, this may not be the case. But on
average, last year’s earnings will often provide a pretty
good estimate for normal earnings going forward.
That’s why, if we actually use the magic formula, we’ll
want to own 20 or 30 stocks at one time. In the magic formula’s case, we want the average (that is, the average
return for a portfolio of stocks chosen by the magic formula). Since average results for the magic formula will,
hopefully, mean extraordinary investment returns, owning
many different stocks chosen by the magic formula should
help ensure that we stay pretty close to that average.
By now, I hope I’ve convinced 99 percent of you to
just stick with the magic formula. But for those few who
still hope to develop a winning strategy for picking individual stocks, there is something that you should consider.
Even professional research analysts and money managers
have a tough time making accurate earnings predictions
[104] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

for individual companies. For these professionals, making
accurate predictions for 20 or 30 companies at the same
time is even harder. It won’t be any easier for you.
So here’s my suggestion. If you still want to buy individual stocks despite all the warnings, don’t even try to
make a lot of predictions. Limit your stock investments to
a small number of “good” companies that are available at
bargain levels. For those few investors who are capable of
estimating normal earnings several years into the future
and placing values on businesses, owning just a handful of
bargain-priced stocks is the best way to go. As a general
rule of thumb, if you are truly doing good research and
have a good understanding of the companies that you purchase, owning just five to eight stocks in different industries can safely make up at least 80 percent of your total
portfolio.*
But what if you aren’t an expert at valuing businesses
and making predictions? Isn’t there still some way you can
intelligently play the stock-picking game? While it may
not be smart to hang out in dynamite factories, so what?
Some people would rather have a blast. Well, okay. There
is a compromise strategy, and it makes sense, too. But
you’re still going to need the magic formula—there’s just
no way around that (not in this book, anyway).
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [105]
*Not sure that makes sense? See the box at the end of the chapter!

Here it is. Rather than just blindly choosing stocks
that catch your fancy or blindly accepting the output of
the magic formula, how about combining both strategies?
Start with the magic formula and put together a list of
top-ranked stocks. Then choose a few of your favorites by
whatever method you want. You must, however, choose
solely from the top 50 or 100 stocks as ranked by the
magic formula.* Using this method, you should still place
at least 10 to 30 stocks in your portfolio (the lower end of
this range if you actually know something about evaluating businesses and the higher end if you are choosing
stocks based on birth signs). And that should do it.
Now for the summary:
1. Most people have no business investing in individual
stocks on their own!
2. Reread summary point number 1.
3. But if you must . . . and you can actually predict normalized earnings several years down the road, use
those estimates to figure out earnings yield and
return on capital. Then, use the principles of the
magic formula to look for good companies at bargain
prices based on your estimates of normal earnings.
[106] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Don’t worry, we’ll learn how to easily compile a list of top-ranked stocks
later.

4. If you truly understand the business that you own
and have a high degree of confidence in your normalized earnings estimates, owning five to eight
bargain-priced stocks in different industries can be
a safe and effective investment strategy.
5. Most people have no business investing in individual
stocks on their own! (Did I already mention that?)
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [107]
How can owning just five to eight stocks possibly be
a safe strategy? Think of it this way.* You’re a successful local businessman who has just sold off his
business for $1 million. You want to invest that money
wisely so that you can safely earn a good return over
time. You have the opportunity to reinvest the proceeds from the sale of your business by buying an
ownership stake in some of the other businesses in
town. You have some understanding of about 30 of
those businesses, and your plan is to invest in companies that you understand well, that have a good
future, and that are available at a reasonable price.
For those companies about which you feel most
confident in your ability to make predictions, you
project what normal earnings should be several years
*To borrow an analogy from one of the world’s greatest investors.

[108] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
down the road. You also look for companies that you
believe will be able to continue in business for many
years and for companies that should have the ability
to grow their earnings over time. Then you calculate
earnings yield and return on capital based on your
estimates for each of those companies. Of course,
your goal is to find good businesses that can be purchased at bargain prices. On the basis of your analysis, you select your five favorites and invest $200,000
in each.
Does that sound like risky behavior? It would be
if you had no idea how to read financial statements or
evaluate individual businesses. But if you do have that
ability, is buying a stake in your five favorite businesses enough? Would owning a stake in your eight
favorites be better? I think most people, especially
those who view stocks as long-term ownership stakes
in actual businesses, would think that spreading that
$1 million among investment stakes in five to eight
bargain-priced businesses in varying industries would
qualify as prudent behavior.
At least, that’s the view I take with my investment
portfolio. The more confidence I have in each one of
my stock picks, the fewer companies I need to own in

T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [109]
my portfolio to feel comfortable. Most investors view
stocks and the construction of stock portfolios differently, however.
Somehow, when ownership interests are divided
into shares that bounce around with Mr. Market’s
moods, individuals and professionals start to think
about and measure risk in strange ways. When shortterm thinking and overly complicated statistics get
involved, owning many companies that you know very
little about starts to sound safer than owning stakes in
five to eight companies that have good businesses,
predictable futures, and bargain prices. In short, for
the few who have the ability, knowledge, and time to
predict normal earnings and evaluate individual
stocks, owning less can actually be more—more profits, more safety . . . and more fun!

Chapter Twelve
THERE’S SOMETHING ABOUT THE TOOTH FAIRY. For some reason, I’ve never been able to fully fess up to my kids about
what’s really going on there. Perhaps I just want them to
hold on to their childhood for as long as possible, or
maybe I just want to cherish the innocence of that stage of
their lives. But whatever it is, I’ve been a rock while under
the most intense of interrogations concerning my whereabouts after money has mysteriously appeared under the
various pillows in question.
I’ve had a few close calls, though. I thought the jig
was up one day when one of my kids marched home from
first grade with some new information (it’s scary the kind
of things they pick up hanging out in the school yard). It

seems a friend, with absolutely no regard for all my years
of stonewalling, had spilled the beans. As I was doing all
I could to choke back my disappointment, my miniature
Sherlock Holmes declared, “I know who the tooth fairy
is!” My mind raced for some way out as he continued,
“It’s Billy Gordon’s mother!”
After explaining what a ridiculous logistical and financial nightmare it would be for Billy Gordon’s mother to
roam the entire world each night collecting teeth and
shelling out money, I was able to quell that particular piece
of misinformation. And luckily, either because of a lack of
investigative instincts or merely because they have learned
to humor me over the years, that’s the closest any underage member of my house has come to cracking the case.
But here’s a secret I have no problem divulging. In
my house, whatever story my kids choose to believe is just
fine with me. But in the stock market, there’s only one
version of the story I want them to know. It’s harsh and
it’s unfair, but we all have to grow up sometime. And it’s
about time you know it, too. So here it is. When it comes
to Wall Street,
There ain’t no tooth fairy!*
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [111]
*Of course, since technically that’s a double negative, I still haven’t admitted anything!

That’s right. On Wall Street, money won’t magically
appear under your pillow. There’s no one to tuck you in,
no one to take care of you, and no one you can turn to for
good advice. Once you’ve left the warmth and comfort of
your own home, the plain fact is, you’re on your own.
To see why this is necessarily so, we’re going to take
our own little walk down Wall Street. But before we set
out, let’s make a few assumptions. First, you have some
money that you would like to invest over the long term.
(Long term, in this case, means that you will not need this
money to cover your normal expenses for at least the next
three to five years—and, hopefully, longer.)* Second, you
would like to earn as much as possible from your investments, but you are unwilling to take unreasonable risks.
Finally, you’ve heard (and this is generally true) that the
stock market offers the best possibility for high investment returns over time, and this is where you would like
to put most of your money. So, fine, where do we start?
Well, one typical stop is our friendly neighborhood
stockbroker. This is an investment professional whose job is
to hold your hand and help you invest your money. Your
[112] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Since Mr. Market can do anything in the short term, money that you
require over the next few years for necessities is best left in the bank. Otherwise, you may be forced to sell to Mr. Market at just the wrong time (for
instance, when you need money to cover expenses and a depressed Mr. Market is offering low prices for your shares).

stockbroker will help you choose between individual
stocks, bonds, investment funds, and various other investment alternatives. If you have enough money, he or she
will even speak with you on the phone, try to understand
your needs, and give you suggestions and advice.
But here’s the thing. If your stockbroker is like the
vast majority, he or she has no idea how to help you! Most
get paid a fee to sell you a stock or a bond or some other
investment product. They don’t get paid to make you
money. Of course, while it’s in their interest for you to be
successful and many may be fine, well-intentioned professionals, a stockbroker’s main incentive is still to sell you
something. They are trained to follow rules, understand
certain financial terms, and explain various investment
products. As for how to make you money in the stock
market or anywhere else, forget it!
You might as well just put your money in a mutual fund.
Now here’s the perfect solution for a small investor. A
mutual fund is an investment fund that is managed by a professional money manager. The manager usually selects a
diverse group of stocks or bonds, generally from 30 to 200
different securities in the same fund. This is a particularly
efficient way for a small investor to spread his or her investment capital over a wide group of different investments.
But here, too, there are some problems. As we’ve discussed before, it’s tough to have special insight into many
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [113]

different companies and investment securities. Consequently, owning dozens or even hundreds of positions
does not often lead to above-average returns. Then, of
course, there is the small matter of fees. Mutual fund
management companies need to charge a fee for their services. Basic math says that average returns minus fees
equals below-average returns. Not surprisingly, after subtracting fees and other expenses, the vast majority of
mutual funds do not beat the market averages over time.
But that’s okay. We can just look for mutual funds
that have above-average managers. It should be relatively
easy to tell whether a manager is above average simply by
looking at the fund’s track record. The only problem with
this strategy is that on average there is no relationship
between a fund’s good past investment record and its
future returns. Even companies whose business is to rate
mutual funds have a poor record of determining which
funds will perform well in the future.
While there are many reasons for this, all of them are
difficult to resolve. Mutual fund management companies
get paid based on how much money is invested in each
fund. A fund with a successful track record will usually
attract more money over time. It is usually in the fund’s
economic interest to accept this money. Once a fund
grows larger, it may be hard for the manager to continue
with the same strategy that led to the successful returns.
[114] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

A few good ideas may now be spread even thinner over a
larger pile of money. If investment in smaller companies is
partially responsible for some of the success, this may no
longer be possible in a larger fund. Also, even talented
managers have bad stretches of investment performance
(just like the magic formula). Conversely, bad managers
can have good stretches. Telling which is which, even over
periods of several years, is quite difficult. I could go on,
but the facts are the facts. A good past investment record
isn’t much help when predicting future returns, and picking a good manager is likely no easier than picking attractive individual stocks. Then again, if you could pick
attractive stocks, you probably wouldn’t need the good
manager!
So, instead, you might consider investing in a hedge
fund. These are exclusive private investment funds usually reserved for very wealthy investors. Unfortunately, in
most cases, unless you already have at least $500,000 or
so to invest, you probably won’t even have this option. By
law, most hedge funds can only accept investors who can
afford to lose large amounts of money. But even if you
qualify for this dubious honor, it’s not clear that this is a
smart way to go.
Hedge funds are investment funds that have more
flexibility than most mutual funds. Managers can use the
fund’s capital and borrowed money to buy a large variety
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [115]

of securities. Generally, they are able to place bets on
whether stocks, other securities, or entire market averages will move up or down. Most mutual funds are
restricted to making money only when the securities they
own go up. A hedge fund’s ability to bet up or down over
many different securities, often with the aid of borrowed
money, is seen as a big advantage over most standard
mutual funds. It may be. But most hedge funds charge
huge fees—at least 1 percent of assets under management
plus a 20 percent share of the profits. No doubt attracted
by the large fees, thousands of new hedge funds have
been created over the past few years. Most will have no
chance of justifying their fees. There just aren’t that
many great managers, and your chances of finding one
are quite slim.
So that’s why many people just choose to invest in an
index fund.* An index fund is a mutual fund that just tries
to equal the overall market’s return, less a very small fee.
These funds pick a market index (perhaps the S&P 500
index of 500 large stocks or the Russell 2000 index, an
index that consists of 2,000 somewhat smaller stocks) and
buy all of the stocks in that particular index. Although
[116] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Or an exchange-traded fund (ETF), an index fund that trades similar to the
way a stock trades.

this strategy won’t help you beat the market, it will help
you achieve returns that are at least close to the market
averages.* Since, after taking into account fees and other
costs, most other investment choices leave you with much
lower returns than index funds, many people who have
carefully studied the issue have concluded that settling for
average returns is actually a pretty good alternative. In
fact, over the last 80 years, average returns from the stock
market have meant returns of over 10 percent per year.
Not too bad at all.
But what if you want to do better than average? The
simple truth is there’s no stop on our little walk that has an
answer for that one. That’s because it’s pretty much like
I told you before: On Wall Street, there is no tooth fairy.
Once you leave home, you can put your money under a
professional’s pillow, but chances are, when you wake up,
all you’ll be left with is lousy performance.
Of course, I know what you’re going to ask. Isn’t
there somewhere you can go? Something you can do?
Someone you can turn to?
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [117]
*Also, if you are not investing using a tax-free retirement account and taxes
are a concern for you, this strategy will minimize the amount of taxes you
must pay because index funds typically do not sell their stock holdings
unless a particular security is dropped from the index. This is usually less
than 10 percent of the securities in the index in any one year.

Well, it should come as no surprise that after 25 years
in the investment business, I’ve been asked these same
questions many times. From time to time, I have been able
to recommend a particularly good mutual fund manager
or an exceptional hedge fund manager. In all cases, the
funds in question have subsequently grown to many times
their original size and the investment opportunity has
largely vanished in a rather short period of time. I have
also tried to help people by giving out an occasional stock
tip. However, an occasional stock tip from me is not a
very reliable or universally available long-term investment
strategy.
So I’m usually at a loss. If you want to do as little as
possible and you don’t mind doing average, an index fund
could be a fine choice. But if you are capable of analyzing
businesses and willing to do a fair amount of work, selectively picking individual stocks can be a viable alternative.
The only problem is that most people don’t have the time
or ability to analyze individual companies. As we discussed last chapter, if you don’t know how to evaluate
businesses and project normal earnings several years into
the future, you have no business investing in individual
stocks in the first place.
So here’s the thing. As unbelievable as it may seem, if
you truly want to beat the market, there really is only one
[118] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

good alternative left. After all we’ve been through, I
probably don’t have to spell it out for you. But let’s just
say it rhymes with . . . bagic mormula.
That’s right. Just like I promised earlier, by following
the simple steps outlined at the end of this book, you can
use the magic formula to beat the market. You can achieve
extraordinary long-term investment returns, and you can
achieve those returns with low risk. By following step-bystep, you’ll know exactly where to go and what to do. It
won’t even take much work—just minutes every few
months.
But that’s not the hard part. The hard part is making
sure that you understand why the magic formula makes
sense. The hard part is continuing to believe that the
magic formula still makes sense even when friends,
experts, the news media, and Mr. Market indicate otherwise. Lastly, the hard part is just getting started, though
I’ve tried to make that task as easy as possible.
So, good luck. I truly believe that if you follow the
lessons in this book, you will have a great deal of investment success. That’s what makes the next chapter so
important. After all, if my calculations are correct, you’re
still going to be left with a pretty big problem. I’m very
serious. I mean, what are you going to do with all that
money?
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [119]

Quick Summary
1. On Wall Street, there ain’t no tooth fairy!
2. Nothing much rhymes with magic formula.
3. Your step-by-step instructions for beating the market using the magic formula are coming right after
the next chapter.
[120] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Chapter Thirteen
WHAT WOULD YOU DO IF YOU HAD A LOT OF MONEY? Of
course, I mean what would you do after taking care of
your family and those close to you, after providing for
retirement and the future of your loved ones, and after
putting some aside to buy a few luxuries along the way?
What would you do?
Actually, you may well have to answer that question
someday. But don’t worry. I’m not going to bore you with
a pile of statistics. I’m not going to tell you about all the
money you could make by using the magic formula. I’m
not even going to discuss the whole idea of compound interest. That’s the one where you invest a relatively small
amount of money, earn a reasonable rate of return over

time, continually reinvest all the earnings from those investments, and end up with a large amount of money. I’m
not going to talk about that.
It’s really too bad, though. With the new rules for
contributing larger amounts of money to tax-advantaged
retirement accounts, it would have been a good thing to
discuss. As it turns out, starting now and making the maximum allowable contribution to an IRA* for just the next
few years, you could turn a relatively small amount of
money into a much larger amount. Obviously, with the
type of returns achieved by the magic formula in the past,
this really could have meant a lot of money for you. But,
unfortunately, we’re not going to discuss it.
It’s truly a shame. By contributing just $28,000 in
total over the next six years (the maximum of $4,000 per
year in both 2006 and 2007 and then $5,000 per year
starting in 2008 for four years†
), your retirement account
could have grown to over $325,000 at the end of 20 years
and over $1.3 million after 30 years. That’s if you could
achieve an annual return on your investments of 15 percent. Of course, the past record of the magic formula is
somewhat better than 15 percent per year, but it would be
irresponsible to project some higher annual return far into
[122] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Either a traditional investment retirement account or a Roth IRA.
†
Thereafter making no further contributions of any kind.

the future. That’s because picking a number like 20 percent per year would turn that initial $28,000* into
$752,000 after 20 years and more than $4.3 million after
30 years. At an astronomical rate like 25 percent per year
(a return that is still lower than the past returns of one of
our portfolios of smaller magic formula stocks), that
$28,000 would have become more than $1.6 million in 20
years and over $13.4 million in 30 years.† But who’s really
counting, and with numbers like that, thank heaven I had
the good sense not to mention it.
But I will say this. If you are still in middle school or
even high school and you are approached by anyone—and
I mean anyone, no matter how fancy their scooter or how
persuasive their sales pitch—and they want you to purchase a single stick of gum for 25 cents, I have just three
words of advice:
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [123]
*From investing the maximum allowable $4,000 per year in an IRA over the
next two years and then the increased maximum of $5,000 per year for the
following four years equaling $28,000 over the six years.
†
It’s fascinating to note that if you had decided to contribute $5,000 per
year for the remaining 24 years of this 30-year period, rather than stopping
contributions after just six years as we did in this example, your IRA
account would have grown to approximately $16.5 million after 30 years
versus the $13.4 million from just those six contributions. Had we decided
to talk about compound interest, the relatively smaller benefit from those
last 24 contributions would have illustrated how truly important starting as
early as possible is to achieving the full benefits of compounding.

Don’t do it!
I say that not because at any moment you could be
forced to stand in the corner with a wad of gum stuck to
your nose. I say that because if you understood how a wellinvested quarter could possibly turn into more than $200 by
the time you hit middle age,* you might not squander so
much money on a single stick of gum! You might not spend
money on a lot of things. Instead, you might start thinking
about saving money whenever possible and spending time figuring out a good way to invest it. That’s what I’m saying.
Unfortunately, one thing I’m not saying is that using
the magic formula for your investments going forward will
guarantee results similar to the stellar performance of the
past. I can’t know that.† But I can say this:
I believe that using the magic formula and the principles
behind the magic formula to guide your future investments will
[124] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Twenty-five cents invested at a return of 25 percent a year for 30 years
would get you more than $200. Of course, I’m not saying you would actually achieve this type of return (as you know, I would never say that).
†
Though, since the market averages returned roughly 12 percent per year
(including dividends) during the course of our 17-year study and my best
guess for the market averages going forward is closer to 6 to 10 percent per
year, you may want to start by adjusting down your hopes and/or expectations for the future absolute results of using the magic formula by 3 or 4
percent per year as compared to the results found in the study. But, once
again, I can’t really know.

remain one of your very best investment alternatives. I believe
that if you are able to stick with the magic formula strategy
through good periods and bad, you will handily beat the market
averages over time. In short, I believe that, even after everyone
knows the magic formula, your results will continue to be not
only “quite satisfactory,” but with a little luck, extraordinary.
So, here’s the deal. If you do end up using the magic
formula and if it helps you earn enough money that you
feel grateful for your good fortune, you might consider
this. In reality, all the time and effort put into stock market investing isn’t a very productive use of time. Usually,
when you buy or sell shares in a publicly traded company,* you are merely buying from or selling to another
shareholder. In other words, the underlying company is
not involved. It receives nothing from the transaction.
Many people argue that all this buying and selling
activity is, nevertheless, quite useful. Through the buying
and selling of shares, these people would argue, an active
marketplace for the company’s shares is established. Theoretically, if a company needs additional money, it can
decide to sell additional shares into this marketplace. It
can use the proceeds to pay bills, build factories, or
expand in some other way. This is all true. Also, if Jason
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [125]
*A company that files its financial information with the government and
whose shares the general public may buy and sell.

decides to expand his gum store chain from 10 stores to
300, he can sell some shares in his new and growing business directly to the public and raise money for the expansion. Since the buyers of Jason’s Gum Shop shares know
that there will be a marketplace for selling those shares
after their initial purchase, Jason may have an easier time
raising money for his business. The people who see great
value in stock trading are right about this, too.
I’m just not one of those people. Yes, it is nice to have
a marketplace. In fact, it’s very important. It’s just that
more than 95 percent of the trading back and forth each
day is probably unnecessary. The market would still be
fine without almost all of it. The market would certainly
be fine without your contribution.
In fact, the first day of class each semester, I tell all of
my MBA students that I’m about to teach them skills that
have limited value. It’s not that they won’t have the potential to make a lot of money from what they learn. It’s that
there are probably higher and better uses for their time
and intellect. As a consequence, in exchange for teaching
them, I always ask my students to find some way to give
back.*
So, for you, too, I hope this book and the step-by-step
instructions that follow will help you reach all of your
[126] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*For some more thoughts, see the box at the end of the chapter.

investment goals. I strongly believe that it will. I also hope
that those investment goals will include using some of
your good fortune to make a difference in those areas that
are important and have meaning to you.
Good luck.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [127]
There are, of course, many worthwhile things to do
with your money in addition to caring for those near
and dear to you. Whether it involves supporting medical research, aiding the poor, promoting social justice, or supporting pretty much any worthy cause that
you believe in, all would obviously be wonderful
choices for your charitable dollars. But since this
entire book is about investing your money in places
where it can earn a high return on capital, I have one
additional thought that you might consider.
It is our education system that nurtures the entrepreneurs, scientists, engineers, technologists, and
high-level workforce that help our economy grow and
thrive. Over time, the performance of the stock market reflects this progress. Yet it is very clear that we
are wasting much of our future potential. In almost
every major city in the United States, barely half of
entering public school ninth-graders end up graduat
[128] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
ing from high school. Think about that for a moment.
Undoubtedly, there are many reasons for this devastating waste, but the problems, whatever they might
be, clearly cut across all grade levels. Many students
enter the ninth grade already four and five grade levels behind.
So how should we solve this problem? Obviously,
teaching young people should be a top priority, and
spending money to teach children the skills necessary
to become productive members of society should be a
great investment. Talk about a high return on capital!
Just as obvious is that there are negative costs to
doing a bad job—crime, drugs, and welfare, to name
a few. So, how are we trying to solve this problem?
Under capitalism, it would be pretty straightforward. If we were trying to fix a business like Just
Broccoli, we would first try to change a few things.
Maybe we would fire bad managers, hire better salespeople, or do some advertising, but eventually, if
results didn’t improve, we would just close the stores.
Under our system of capitalism, companies that can’t
earn an adequate return on capital eventually go out
of business. That’s very healthy. Instead of continually throwing money into investments that achieve

T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [129]
poor returns, under capitalism money is systematically redirected into businesses that can make productive use of new capital. That’s how our economy
continues to grow and thrive over time.
So how would you fix the public school system?
First, you would try to make some changes. You
might fire bad teachers, pay more for good teachers,
remove bad principals, and at the end of the day,
close bad schools. The money spent on the bad
schools would be redirected to schools (public or private) that could get a higher return on the capital
spent. Unfortunately, in the case of inner-city public
schools, the same problems have been going on for
over 40 years and the “fixes” have been going on for
just as long!
The difference is this. In capitalism, if the fixes
don’t work, the business closes. With public schools,
this rarely happens. It’s almost impossible to fire bad
teachers, pay more for good teachers, or close bad
schools. In short, there are no penalties for poor performance, incentives for good performance, or consequences for running a poor business.
As a result, money spent on bad teachers or bad
schools is almost never redirected to teachers or

[130] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
schools that can achieve higher returns on that capital! So if we want to apply what we have learned about
capitalism, any solutions, whether they involve public
school reform, charter schools, or voucher programs,
need to address these issues. Otherwise, we’ll be
stuck with a Just Broccoli school system for a long
time to come!*
*If you have further interest, some web sites you might consider:
successforall.net, alliance forschoolchoice.com, schoolachievement.org,
democratsforeducationreform.org.

Step-by-Step Instructions
Here’s the big picture. As you know, the magic formula
has achieved excellent results in the past. So our goal is to
create an easy-to-follow plan that will help reproduce
those good results. But before we adopt any strategy, we
need to consider a few things.
First, since the returns reported in this book were
based on holding a portfolio of roughly 30 stocks
selected by the magic formula, we should make sure that
our plan includes holding at least 20 to 30 stocks at one
time. Remember, the magic formula works on average, so
holding many stocks that are ranked highly by the magic
formula should help keep us close to that average over
time.*
Second, in our tests, each stock was held for a period
*Obviously, if you are already good at analyzing businesses and doing your
own research and are merely using the magic formula as a guideline to find
attractive individual stocks, these diversification rules do not apply to you.
On the other hand, if you are doing a limited amount of work on individual
stocks or no work at all (like most investors), diversifying with 20 or 30
magic formula stocks is most definitely the right plan for you.

of one year. Holding stocks for one year is still fine for taxfree accounts. For taxable accounts, we will want to adjust
that slightly. For individual stocks in which we are showing
a loss from our initial purchase price, we will want to sell a
few days before our one-year holding period is up. For those
stocks with a gain, we will want to sell a day or two after the
one-year period is up. In that way, all of our gains will
receive the advantages of the lower tax rate afforded to
long-term capital gains (a maximum 15 percent tax rate
under federal guidelines for stocks held more than one
year), and all of our losses will receive short-term tax treatment (a deduction against other sources of income that
otherwise could have been taxable at rates up to 35 percent). Over time, this minor adjustment can add significantly to our after-tax investment returns.
Lastly, be aware that getting started will be the hardest part. We probably don’t want to buy all 30 stocks at
once. To reproduce the results from our tests, we will
have to work into our magic formula portfolio over the
course of our first year of investing. That means adding 5
to 7 stocks to our portfolio every few months until we
reach 20 or 30 stocks in our portfolio. Thereafter, as
stocks in our portfolio reach the one-year holding mark,
we will replace only the 5 to 7 stocks that have been held
for one year. If that’s a little confusing, don’t worry, stepby-step instructions are about to follow.
Now that we have that settled, we need to discuss a
[132] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

few simple ways to find our magic formula stocks. There
are many choices for screening packages to help us sort
through the universe of available stocks, both Web-based
programs and software programs that utilize the Web for
updates. Some of these options are available for free,
while others can cost up to $99 per month or even more.
Each has advantages and disadvantages based on ease of
operation and the reliability, flexibility, and breadth of
data sources. Most will generate a reasonable set of magic
formula stocks if certain conditions are applied, which are
discussed below.
One screening option was created specifically for this
book, magicformulainvesting.com. The magicformula
investing.com site is designed to emulate the returns
achieved in our study as closely as possible. This site is
currently available for free. Step-by-step instructions for
selecting stocks using magicformulainvest ing.com follow.
Other options include, but are not limited to, the
screening packages available at businessweek.com, aaii
.com, moneycentral.msn.com, powerinvestor.com, and
smartmoney.com. Though these sources are generally fine,
and are available either for free or at a reasonable price, they
are not specifically designed to generate magic formula
stocks. They will only give a rough approximation of the
magic formula results because of differences both in the criteria the user can select and the underlying data sources.
General screening instructions are available on each site.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [133]

Option 1: MagicFormulaInvesting.com
Step 1
Go to magicformulainvesting.com.
Step 2
Follow the instructions for choosing company size (e.g.,
companies with market capitalizations over $50 million,
or over $200 million, or over $1 billion, etc.). For most
individuals, companies with market capitalizations above
$50 million or $100 million should be of sufficient size.
Step 3
Follow the instructions to obtain a list of top-ranked
magic formula companies.
Step 4
Buy five to seven top-ranked companies. To start, invest
only 20 to 33 percent of the money you intend to invest
during the first year (for smaller amounts of capital, lowerpriced Web brokers such as foliofn.com, buyandhold.com,
and scottrade.com may be a good place to start).
Step 5
Repeat Step 4 every two to three months until you have
invested all of the money you have chosen to allocate to your
magic formula portfolio. After 9 or 10 months, this should
[134] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

result in a portfolio of 20 to 30 stocks (e.g., seven stocks
every three months, five or six stocks every two months).
Step 6
Sell each stock after holding it for one year. For taxable
accounts, sell winners after holding them a few days more
than one year and sell losers after holding them a few days
less than one year (as previously described). Use the proceeds from any sale and any additional investment money
to replace the sold companies with an equal number of
new magic formula selections (Step 4).
Step 7
Continue this process for many years. Remember, you must
be committed to continuing this process for a minimum of three
to five years, regardless of results. Otherwise, you will most
likely quit before the magic formula has a chance to work!
Step 8
Feel free to write and thank me.
Option 2: General Screening Instructions
If using any screening option other than magicformula
investing.com, you should take the following steps to best
approximate the results of the magic formula:
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [135]

• Use Return on Assets (ROA) as a screening criterion.
Set the minimum ROA at 25%. (This will take the
place of return on capital from the magic formula study.)
• From the resulting group of high ROA stocks,
screen for those stocks with the lowest Price/Earning (P/E) ratios. (This will take the place of earnings
yield from the magic formula study.)
• Eliminate all utilities and financial stocks (i.e., mutual funds, banks and insurance companies) from
the list.
• Eliminate all foreign companies from the list. In
most cases, these will have the suffix “ADR” (for
“American Depository Receipt”) after the name of
the stock.
• If a stock has a very low P/E ratio, say 5 or less, that
may indicate that the previous year or the data being
used are unusual in some way. You may want to eliminate these stocks from your list. You may also want
to eliminate any company that has announced earnings in the last week. (This should help minimize the
incidence of incorrect or untimely data.)
• After obtaining your list, follow steps 4 and 8 from
the magicformulainvesting.com instruction page.
[136] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

Appendix
IMPORTANT NOTICE: This appendix is not required reading. To utilize the magic formula strategy
successfully, you must understand only two basic concepts. First, buying good companies at bargain prices
makes sense. On average, this is what the magic formula does. Second, it can take Mr. Market several years
to recognize a bargain. Therefore, the magic formula
strategy requires patience. The information that follows in this section is merely additional commentary
on these two points.
This appendix includes background information
about the magic formula for those with a higher level of
understanding of financial statements. It also compares
the logic and results of the magic formula strategy with
other studies and methods that have demonstrated an
ability to beat the market.

The Magic Formula
The magic formula ranks companies based on two factors:
return on capital and earnings yield. These factors can be measured in several different ways. The measures chosen for the
study in this book are described in more detail as follows:*
1. Return on Capital
EBIT/(Net Working Capital + Net Fixed Assets)
Return on capital was measured by calculating the ratio
of pre-tax operating earnings (EBIT) to tangible capital
*For purposes of the study, earnings-related numbers were based on the latest 12-month period, balance sheet items were based on the most recent balance sheet, and market prices were based on the most recent closing price.
Utilities, financial stocks and companies where we could not be certain that
the information in the database was timely or complete were eliminated.
Adjustments were also made for certain non-interest bearing liabilities. The
study was structured so that an average of 30 stocks was held during the
study period. Stocks with only limited liquidity were eliminated from the
study. Market capitalizations were determined based on 2003 dollars. Both
the number of companies in each decile as well as the number of companies
in each market capitalization group fluctuated as the number of companies
in the database varied during the study period.

employed (Net Working Capital + Net Fixed Assets).
This ratio was used rather than the more commonly used
ratios of return on equity (ROE, earnings/equity) or return
on assets (ROA, earnings/assets) for several reasons.
EBIT (or earnings before interest and taxes) was used in
place of reported earnings because companies operate
with different levels of debt and differing tax rates. Using
operating earnings before interest and taxes, or EBIT,
allowed us to view and compare the operating earnings of
different companies without the distortions arising from
differences in tax rates and debt levels. For each company,
it was then possible to compare actual earnings from operations (EBIT) to the cost of the assets used to produce
those earnings (tangible capital employed).*
Net Working Capital + Net Fixed Assets (or tangible
capital employed) was used in place of total assets (used in an
ROA calculation) or equity (used in an ROE calculation).
The idea here was to figure out how much capital is actually
needed to conduct the company’s business. Net working
capital was used because a company has to fund its receivables and inventory (excess cash not needed to conduct the
business was excluded from this calculation) but does not
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [139]
*For purposes of the study and in the interest of simplicity, it was assumed
that depreciation and amortization expense (noncash charges against earnings) were roughly equal to maintenance capital spending requirements
(cash expenses not charged against earnings). It was, therefore, assumed
that EBITDA − Maintenance Cap/Expenditures = EBIT.

have to lay out money for its payables, as these are effectively an interest-free loan (short-term interest-bearing debt
was excluded from current liabili-ties for this calculation). In
addition to working capital requirements, a company must
also fund the purchase of fixed assets necessary to conduct
its business, such as real estate, plant, and equipment. The
[140] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
NOTE: Intangible assets, specifically goodwill, were
excluded from the tangible capital employed calculations. Goodwill usually arises as a result of an acquisition of another company. The cost of an acquisition
in excess of the tangible assets acquired is usually
assigned to a goodwill account. In order to conduct
its future business, the acquiring company usually
only has to replace tangible assets, such as plant and
equipment. Goodwill is a historical cost that does not
have to be constantly replaced. Therefore, in most
cases, return on tangible capital alone (excluding
goodwill) will be a more accurate reflection of a business’s return on capital going forward. The ROE and
ROA calculations used by many investment analysts
are therefore often distorted by ignoring the difference between reported equity and assets and tangible
equity and assets in addition to distortions due to differing tax rates and debt levels.

depreciated net cost of these fixed assets was then added to
the net working capital requirements already calculated to
arrive at an estimate for tangible capital employed.
2. Earnings Yield
EBIT/Enterprise Value
Earnings yield was measured by calculating the ratio of
pre-tax operating earnings (EBIT) to enterprise value (market value of equity* + net interest-bearing debt). This ratio
was used rather than the more commonly used P/E ratio
(price/earnings ratio) or E/P ratio (earnings/price ratio) for
several reasons. The basic idea behind the concept of earnings yield is simply to figure out how much a business
earns relative to the purchase price of the business.
Enterprise value was used instead of merely the price of
equity (i.e., total market capitalization, share price multiplied
by shares outstanding) because enterprise value takes into
account both the price paid for an equity stake in a business
as well as the debt financing used by a company to help generate operating earnings. By using EBIT (which looks at
actual operating earnings before interest expense and taxes)
and comparing it to enterprise value, we can calculate the
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [141]
*Including preferred equity.

pre-tax earnings yield on the full purchase price of a business (i.e., pre-tax operating earnings relative to the price of
equity plus any debt assumed). This allows us to put companies with different levels of debt and different tax rates on
an equal footing when comparing earnings yields.
For example, in the case of an office building purchased
for $1 million with an $800,000 mortgage and $200,000 in
equity, the price of equity is $200,000 but the enterprise
value is $1 million. If the building generates EBIT (earnings
before interest and taxes) of $100,000, then EBIT/EV or
the pre-tax earnings yield would be 10 percent ($100,000/
$1,000,000). However, the use of debt can greatly skew
apparent returns from the purchase of these same assets
when only the price of equity is considered. Assuming an
interest rate of 6 percent on an $800,000 mortgage and a 40
percent corporate tax rate, the pre-tax earnings yield on our
equity purchase price of $200,000 would appear to be 26
percent.* As debt levels change, this pre-tax earnings yield
[142] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*$100,000 in EBIT less $48,000 in interest expense equals $52,000 in pretax
income. $52,000/$200,000 equals 26 percent. The E/P (earnings/price), or
after-tax earnings yield, would be 15.6 percent ($100,000 in EBIT less
$48,000 in interest less $20,800 in income tax equals $31,200 in after-tax
income; $31,200/$200,000 equals 15.6 percent). This 15.6 percent return
would be more comparable to looking at an EBIT/EV after-tax yield of 6 percent (i.e., looking at EBIT as if fully taxed, or net operating profit after tax
divided by EV; it is important to note that the fully taxed EBIT to enterprise value of
6 percent would be the earnings yield ratio used to measure investment alternatives versus the risk-free 10-year government bond yield, not the EBIT/EV ratio of 10 percent).

on equity would keep changing, yet the $1 million cost of
the building and the $100,000 EBIT generated by that
building would remain unchanged. In other words, P/E and
E/P are greatly influenced by changes in debt levels and tax
rates, while EBIT/EV is not.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [143]
Consider two companies, Company A and Company
B. They are actually the same company (i.e., the
same sales, the same operating earnings, the same
everything) except that Company A has no debt and
Company B has $50 in debt (at a 10 percent interest
rate). All information is per share.
Company A Company B
Sales $100 $100
EBIT 10 10
Interest exp. 0 5
Pre-tax income 10 5
Taxes (@40%) 4 2
Net income $6 $3
The price of Company A is $60 per share. The
price of Company B is $10 per share. Which is
cheaper?

[144] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
Let’s see. The P/E of Company A is 10 ($60/6 =
10). The P/E of Company B is 3.33 ($10/3). The E/P,
or earnings yield, of Company A is 10 percent (6/60),
while the earnings yield of Company B is 30 percent
(3/10). So which is cheaper? The answer is obvious.
Company B has a P/E of only 3.33 and an earnings
yield of 30 percent. That looks much cheaper than
Company A’s P/E of 10 and earnings yield of only 10
percent. So Company B is clearly cheaper, right?
Not so fast. Let’s look at EBIT/EV for both
companies. They are the same! To a buyer of the
whole company, would it matter whether you paid $10
per share for the company and owed another $50 per share
or you paid $60 and owed nothing? It is the same
thing! You would be buying $10 worth of EBIT for $60,
either way!*
Company A Company B
Enterprise value 60 + 0 = $60 10 + 50 = $60
(price + debt)
EBIT 10 10
*For example, whether you pay $200,000 for a building and assume an
$800,000 mortgage or pay $1 million up front, it should be the same to you.
The building costs $1 million either way!

A Random Walk Spoiled
For many years, academics have debated whether it is
possible to find bargain-priced stocks other than by
chance. This notion, sometimes loosely referred to as
the random walk or efficient market theory, suggests that
for the most part, the stock market is very efficient at
taking in all publicly available information and setting
stock prices. That is, through the interaction of knowledgeable buyers and sellers, the market does a pretty
good job of pricing stocks at “fair” value. This theory,
along with the failure of most professional managers to
beat the market averages over the long term,* has
understandably led to the movement toward indexing, a
cost-effective strategy designed to merely match the
market’s return.
Of course, over the years, many studies have attempted
to identify strategies that can beat the market. But these
studies have often been criticized on numerous grounds.
*Both before and after management fees and expenses.

These include:
1. The study beat the market because the data used to
select stocks weren’t really available to investors at
the time the selections took place (a.k.a. look-ahead
bias).
2. The study was biased because the database used in
the study had been “cleaned up” and excluded
companies that later went bankrupt, making the
study results look better than they really were
(a.k.a. survivorship bias).
3. The study included very small companies that
couldn’t have been purchased at the prices listed in
the database and uncovered companies too small
for professionals to buy.
4. The study did not outperform the market by a
significant amount after factoring in transaction
costs.
5. The study picked stocks that were in some way
“riskier” than the market, and that’s why performance was better.
6. The stock selection strategy was based on backtesting many different stock selection strategies
until one was found that worked (a.k.a. data mining).
7. The stock selection strategies used to beat the market included knowledge gained from previous
“market-beating” studies that was not available at
[146] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

the time the stock purchases were made in the
study.
Luckily, the magic formula study doesn’t appear to
have had any of these problems. A newly released database from Standard & Poor’s Compustat, called “Point in
Time,” was used. This database contains the exact information that was available to Compustat customers on each
date tested during the study period. The database goes
back 17 years, the time period selected for the magic formula study. By using only this special database, it was possible to ensure that no look-ahead or survivorship bias
took place.
Further, the magic formula worked for both smalland large-capitalization stocks, provided returns far superior to the market averages, and achieved those returns
while taking on much lower risk than the overall market (no
matter how that risk was measured). Consequently, small
size, high transaction costs, and added risk do not appear
to be reasonable grounds for questioning the validity of
the magic formula results. As for data mining and using
academic research not available at the time of stock selection, this did not take place, either. In fact, the two factors
used for the magic formula study were actually the first
two factors tested. Simply, a high earnings yield combined
with a high return on capital were the two factors we judged
to be most important when analyzing a company before the
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [147]

magic formula study was conducted. In sum, despite its
obvious simplicity and the usual objections, the magic formula appears to work. It works well even when compared
to much more sophisticated strategies used in some of the
best market-beating research completed to date.
Yet, in one sense, the success of the magic formula
strategy should not be a surprise. Simple methods for beating the market have been well known for quite some time.
Many studies over the years have confirmed that valueoriented strategies beat the market over longer time horizons. Several different measures of value have been shown
to work. These strategies include, but are not limited to,
selecting stocks based upon low ratios of price to book
value, price to earnings, price to cash flow, price to sales,
and/or price to dividends. Similar to the results found in the
magic formula study, these simple value strategies do not
always work. However, measured over longer periods, they
do. Though these strategies have been well documented
over many years, most individual and professional investors
do not have the patience to use them. Apparently, the long
periods of underperformance make them difficult—and, for
some professionals, impractical—to implement.
Another problem with these simple methods is that,
though they work well, they work far better with smallerand medium-capitalization stocks than with larger stocks.
This should not be surprising, either. Companies that are
[148] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T

too small for professionals to buy and that are not large
enough to generate sufficient commission revenue to justify analyst coverage are more likely to be ignored or misunderstood. As a result, they are more likely to present
opportunities to find bargain-priced stocks. This was the
case in the magic formula study. The formula achieved
the greatest performance with the smallest-capitalization
stocks studied.
However, this good performance cannot be reasonably attributed to a small-cap effect because smallcapitalization stocks did not appreciably outperform large
caps during the study period. Dividing our universe of
stocks into deciles by market capitalization during the 17-
year study period, the smallest 10 percent of stocks provided returns of 12.1 percent, while the largest 10 percent
of stocks returned 11.9 percent. The next deciles were
similarly close: 12.2 percent for the next smallest and 11.9
percent for the next largest.
But the whole issue of whether small-capitalization
stocks outperform large-capitalization stocks is not particularly relevant. It seems clear that there is a greater
opportunity to find bargains (and overpriced stocks, for
that matter) in the small-cap arena both because there are
more stocks to choose from and because smaller stocks
are more likely to be lightly analyzed and, as a result,
more likely to be mispriced. In a sense, it is just easier for
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [149]

simple methods like price/book screens and the magic
formula to find bargain stocks among these smallercapitalization stocks.
However, where the magic formula parts ways with
previous market-beating studies, whether simple or sophisticated, is that for larger stocks (market caps over $1 billion) the results for the magic formula remain incredibly
robust. Other methods do not fare nearly as well. For
example, during our study period, the most widely used
measure to identify value and growth stocks, price to
book value, did not discriminate particularly strongly
between winners and losers for these larger stocks. The
best-ranked decile of low price/book stocks (cheapest 10
percent) beat the worst-ranked decile of high price/book
stocks (most expensive 10 percent) by only 2 percent per
year.*
In comparison, the magic formula strategy did much
better. The best-ranked decile of magic formula stocks
(cheapest 10 percent) beat the worst-ranked decile (most
expensive 10 percent) by over 14 percent per year on average during the 17-year study. The best decile returned
18.88 percent, the worst returned 4.66 percent, while the
market average for this universe of over $1 billion stocks
[150] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*This is 13.72 percent for the lowest price/book decile to 11.51 percent for
the highest price/book decile. The market average for this group was 11.64
percent.

was 11.7 percent. In truth, this is not surprising. While
having a low price relative to the historical cost of assets
may be an indication that a stock is cheap, high earnings relative to price and to the historical cost of assets are much
more direct measures of cheapness and should work better. Of course, these two factors are the ones used in the
magic formula study.
One of the most significant recent studies, conducted by Joseph Piotroski at the University of
Chicago,* took price/book analysis one step further.
Piotroski observed that while low price/book stocks beat
the market on average, less than half of the stocks
selected following this strategy actually outperformed
the market. By using simple and readily available
accounting metrics, Piotroski wondered whether he
could improve the results of a generic price/book strategy. Piotroski rated the top quintile of low price/book
stocks (i.e., the cheapest 20 percent) using nine different measures of financial health. These included measures of profitability, operating efficiency, and balance
sheet strength. The results over the 21-year study were
spectacular . . . with one exception.
For larger stocks, it didn’t really work. For the largest
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [151]
*Piotroski, J. “Value Investing: The Use of Historical Financial Statements to Separate Winners from Losers,” Journal of Accounting Research,
vol. 38, supplement, 2000.

one-third of stocks by market capitalization,* the highestranked stocks on Piotroski’s nine-point scale did not significantly outperform the average low price/book stock.†
This is not surprising, either. As already mentioned, it’s
just easier to find mispriced stocks among smaller- and
mid-capitalization issues.
But this relative inability for market-beating methods
to work with larger-cap stocks is not unique. Even very
sophisticated market-beating strategies, while showing
excellent results in general, do not fare nearly as well as
the relatively simple magic formula in the large-cap universe.‡ For example, some of the best work done to date
on sophisticated factor models was completed by Robert
Haugen and Nardin Baker.§ Professor Haugen actually
started an advisory business based on the excellent results
achieved in this groundbreaking paper.
Essentially, instead of the two factors used in the
magic formula strategy, Haugen developed a sophisticated model using 71 factors that supposedly help predict
[152] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*This is equivalent in the magic formula study to stocks with market capitalizations over approximately $700 million.
†
Though Piotroski’s “lowest”-ranked large-cap stocks did do poorly relative
to other low price/book stocks, his ranking system selected a total of only
34 low-ranked stocks over 21 years.
‡
Or in the small-cap universe.
§
Haugen, R., and N. Baker, “Commonality in the Determinants of
Expected Stock Returns,” Journal of Financial Economics, Summer 1996.

how stocks will do in the future. These 71 factors evaluate
stocks based on “risk, liquidity, financial structure, profitability, price history and analysts’ estimates.” Based on a
complicated weighting of all of these different factors,
Haugen’s model predicts future returns for each stock.
Historical “expected returns” for the stocks in the 3,000+
stock universe evaluated by Haugen’s model have been
posted on his web site, covering the period from February
1994 through November 2004. We decided to test
Haugen’s model to see whether it worked for largecapitalization stocks (those with a market capitalization
over $1 billion in 2004 dollars).
It did. The results were quite spectacular. Over this
10+-year period, the market average for the large-cap universe tested returned 9.38 percent. But buying the highestranked stocks (best-ranked decile) based on Haugen’s
71-factor model returned +22.98 percent. The lowestranked stocks (worst-ranked decile) actually lost 6.91 percent. This amounts to a spread of almost 30 percent
between best and worst! This assumed that stocks were
held for only one month and then reranked at the end of
each month. Of course, though these results were great,
the magic formula did better!
Over the same 10+-year period, the highest-ranked
stocks (best-ranked decile) based on the magic formula
two-factor model returned +24.25 percent. The worstranked stocks (worst-ranked decile) lost 7.91 percent.
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [153]

This amounts to a spread from best to worst of over 32
percent! Though the results from the magic formula
strategy were somewhat better (and easier to achieve)
than the results from the 71-factor model used by Haugen, the performance of both methods was excellent
and quite comparable. But here’s the thing. Most people don’t (and shouldn’t) invest by buying stocks and
holding them for only one month. Besides the huge
amount of time, transaction costs, and tax expense
involved, this is essentially a trading strategy, not really
a practical long-term investment strategy. So what happens if we change our test and hold each portfolio for
one year?*
Actually, something very interesting occurs. Haugen’s 71-factor model still does well: the best-ranked
decile returns +12.55 percent (versus 9.38 percent for
the market) and the worst-ranked decile returns +6.92
percent. The spread from high to low is down to 5.63
percent. If we hadn’t just seen the one-month returns,
this would still look pretty good. But what happens with
the magic formula? The best-ranked decile returns
+18.43 percent and the worst-ranked decile returns
[154] J O E L G R E E N B LAT T
*Portfolios were purchased every month during the 10-year period, and
each portfolio was held for 1 year, so more than 120 separate portfolios
were tested for each strategy.

+1.49 percent—a spread of almost 17 percent between
best and worst! That’s pretty good no matter how you
look at it. Here’s something else that’s interesting. The
worst return during those 10+ years for following the
Haugen strategy for 36 months straight (with annual
turnover) was −43.1 percent. The worst 36-month
period for the magic formula was +14.3 percent. Not
only that, the magic formula used 69 fewer factors and a
lot less math!*
So, here’s the point. The magic formula appears to
perform very well. I think and hope it will continue to perform well in the future. I also hope that, just as Mark
Twain aptly referred to golf as “a good walk spoiled,” perhaps someday the random walk will finally be considered
spoiled as well.†
T H E L I T T L E B O O K T H AT B E ATS T H E M A R K E T [155]
*Professor Haugen does not suggest buying the top 10% of his highest
rated stocks in one portfolio or holding stocks for one year. Also, the losses
for the worst 36 month return for the theoretical “top 10%” Haugen portfolio were similar to the overall market’s loss during that period. The statistics listed were compiled for comparison purposes with the magic formula
portfolio using only those stocks that were included in both the Haugen and
magic formula over $1 billion universe.
†
On second thought, who am I kidding? I hope it lives forever!
